













 



 











 

















Ciao, Rome!

Ciao, world!



Ciao!

What have we forgotten?

What have we forgotten?

We have forgotten you!



Let me be very clear: I'm here for one very simple reason.

To not forget anyone.

God does not leave anyone behind.

That is what He told me when I decided to serve Him.

And it is what I say to you now.

I serve God. I serve you!



We've forgotten the women and children, who will change this world with their love and their kindness.

And with their marvelous, divine disposition to play.



Play is the only authentic means we have to make us feel in harmony with life.

And to be in harmony with God we have to be in harmony with life.

We don't have a choice: we must be in harmony with God!



And what else have we forgotten?

 

We have forgotten to m*st*rb*t*, to use contraceptives, to get abortions, to celebrate gay marriages, to allow priests to love each other, and even to get married.



We've forgotten that we can decide to die if you detest living, we've forgotten to have sexual relations for purposes other than procreation without feeling guilty!



Help!

To divorce, to let nuns say mass, to make babies in all the ways science has discovered and will continue to discover.

In short, my dear, dear children, not only have we forgotten to play, we have forgotten to be happy.

And there is only one road that leads to happiness.

And that road is called freedom.

Sancti Apostoli Petrus et Paulus, de quorum potestate et auctoritate confidimus...

What are you saying, Lenny? What's all this nonsense?

You're not the Pope, Lenny!

I am the Pope!

I'm the Pope, and you, Lenny, are no longer a member of the Church.

You are done with God, Lenny.



 

What you mean done?

I just barely got started with God.

Who are you, Lenny?

I am a contradiction.

Like God. One in three and three in one.

Like Mary, virgin and mother.

Like man, good and evil.

 

Man on the radio: Today Pio XIII's papacy begins. Cardinals are still in Vatican City, and they will leave Rome only after the new Pontiff's first homily.

I am the Pope.

I am the Pope.

Not knowing your tastes, Your Holiness, we took the liberty of preparing a little of everything.

Didn't anyone tell you I don't eat much? Hardly anything, in fact!

All I have in the morning is a Cherry Coke Zero.

We will get some right away.

What's your name?

Domen, Your Holiness.

I am Your Holiness's maggiordomo.

Do you know what Domen means?

One who belongs to God.

Precisely. So, by transitive property... you belong to me.

How did you sleep, Your Holiness?

I had an amusing dream.



Cardinal Ozolins and Cardinal Aguirre slapping each other, and I said the most outrageous things to the crowd in Saint Peter's Square.

Well then, I'll wait here for my Cherry Coke Zero.

In the meantime would Your Holiness care for a regular Diet Coke?

Let's not utter heresies, Domen.

It's death to settle for things in life.

Holy Father, while you wait, may I present Sister Bice, from Nepi, in delightful province of Lazio.

She will be your personal cook.

Sister Bice also served three pontiffs who came before you.

When she was young, she was a missionary in India and fortunately for us, she speaks a good English.

Well, my sweet Holy Father, now what is it you would like to have for your lunch?



You just tell your Bice what you want, and I'll prepare it for you.

Matriciana, pasta e fagioli, carbonara, lasagne...

Am I mistaken, did she say my sweet?

Your Holiness, Sister Bice is rather... quaint.

No, Domen, she is not quaint.

She's friendly.

Mother...

Let me explain something to you, that you, in your long life, have not yet had the occasion to understand: friendly relationships are dangerous.

They lend themselves to ambiguities, misunderstandings, and conflicts, and they always end badly.

Formal relationships, on the other hand, are as clear as spring water.

Their rules are carved in stone.

There's no risk of being misunderstood and they last forever.

Now, you need to know-- I do not appreciate friendly relationships. But I'm a great admirer of formal ones.

Where there are formal relationships there are rites and where there are rites the earth order reigns.

Your Holiness, His Eminence the Cardinal Secretary of State and the Prefects of the Various Congregations can't wait to make your acquaintance and to welcome you.

Well, they're gonna have to.

Because first I have to drink my Cherry Coke Zero.

May God, who has enlightened every heart, help you to know your sins and trust His mercy.

Your sins, Voiello?

Tommasino, don't waste my time.

My sins have to do with high finance and diplomacy.

Even if I were to confess them, you wouldn't understand a thing.

So confess those I can understand.

I've had impure thoughts.

About who?

About the Venus of Willendorf.

Who's she?

The Paleolithic statue the Pope keeps in his library.

It's 25,000 years-old.

Impure and gerontophilic thoughts about a statue...

What sort of penance can I assign for that?

You're making things difficult for me, Voiello!

You think about it and let me know.

I'm in a hurry.

 

Look, guys, the Holy Spirit is blowing away.

Speaking of the Holy Spirit, what do you think?

Did He illumine the cardinals?

The naivet of you Africans is really touching.

Do you really believe that the Holy Spirit elects the Pope?

We Africans, no, but we Catholics, yes, that is what we believe.

Don't you, Ozolins?

Well the Holy Spirit is not stupid but He is ironic and cunning.

I don't understand.

What he's trying to tell you... is that here in Vatican... the Holy Spirit is just another name for Voiello.

Belardo is forty-seven years old.

That's young.

Which means we won't live to see another pope. How sad!

Caltanissetta, it's already a miracle that you've lived long enough to see this one.

I'm not so sure that Voiello has shown good leadership this time.

I've never really trusted Voiello myself.

He's the devil incarnate.

Spencer would have been the right choice.

Far too independent, and that wouldn't have been a good news for us cardinals.



True.

But all we have in exchange is a telegenic puppet.

And that means that he can be manipulated.

This is a masterpiece of Voiello's diplomatic cunning, the way he shepherded the cardinals' votes to Belardo.

Now Belardo holds office, but Voiello is pulling the strings.

And he'll run things the way we tell him, because once again we saved his life.

I may be African, and I may be naive, but if you ask me... you're simplifying the future to an unhealthy degree.

I'm in agreement with our African colleague.

What do you mean by that?

That you've forgotten to ask one fundamental question.

What's Spencer going to do now that his beloved, detested protg has become pope?

 

My God, my God, why have you forsaken me? said Jesus before he was about to die.

Which is what I say to you now, before I begin to live.

God's infinite silence...

God's infinite silence...

God's infinite silence.







Your Holiness... your sins.

I don't have any sins to confess.

Are you serious?

My only sin, and it's an enormous one, is that my conscience does not accuse me of anything.

Ego te absolvo peccatis tuis in nomine Patris, et Filii, et Spiritus Sancti. Amen.

If I always heard confessions like yours, Your Holiness, I'd be out of a job.

How many confessions do you hear in the Vatican, Don Tommaso?

Me?

The entire Curia, a good number of nuns and priests, as well as several lay employees who work in Vatican City.



 

How old are you?

Sixty-one.

And how's your eyesight?

I don't even wear glasses.

And your hearing?

My only problem is my hair, Your Holiness.

You mean it's falling out?

Not only that. Sometimes it hurts.

Your hair hurts?

Good, very good!



I'll be frank, Don Tommaso, I need you.

You must do something very important for the eminency of your pontiff.

Whatever you wish, Holy Father. Tell me.

Come then, I'll tell you in the confessional.

Confessional booths are so beautiful.

They look like little mountain huts.

Do you like the mountains?

I don't like the snow.

Here's what I want you to do.

 

Behold the Naples trinity, Federico.

Your Eminence.

Do you know how many books have been written about me?

Seventeen.

Eighteen.

The last one's going to press next week, and it's got the best title of all.

Which is?

The Man Behind the Scenes.

Beautiful.

Of course. I suggested it myself.

Who wrote it?

Manna, that leftist reporter.

That means it's going to be critical of you, Your Eminence.

Of course, those are the best. They turn you into a legend.



Don't overdo it now, or people will know you're faking it.

Forgive me, Eminence, but that was a good one.

You should laugh, but in proportion.



Valente.

His Holiness?

He's at the Heliport.

He just got here, and he already wants to leave?



Now you could have laughed a little more.

He sent me to tell you he'll be late for your meeting, Eminence.

Okay, but if you see him, tell him not to be too late, because I, unlike him, have a lot to do.

I've got to steet this boat, which that indecisive fisherman Peter left me.



Valente, what do you make of him?

He's a man of little appetite. Actually... very little.

This is not a good sign. Not a good sign.





 

Ma'.

Don't ever call me Ma'. Call me Sister Mary.

What's that?

My father gave it to me.

You can give it to me if you like. I'll hold on to it for you.

No. My father said that I should always keep it with me.

Lenny!

Sister Mary.

Here you are, my saint.

No, I'm not a saint.

Yes.

Do you still have it on you?



Always.

What's this?

A replica of the grotto of Our Lady of Lourdes.

It's being restored.

From now on, you're going to be living at the exact center of the Church.

But I don't understand. What does that mean?

That means that just now the center of the Church took a few steps back.

Do you like the apartment?

I'll be just fine here.

You're only a few feet away from me.

On the plane I read this amusing description of Rome: A suburb of Vatican City. 

Well, that's not exactly true, but it will be.

What's wrong, Lenny?

What's not wrong, Sister Mary.

North is that way.

Where Venice is.

Listen to me, Lenny.

Starting today, you have to lead the Church.

One billion people.

One fifth of the world's population.

Do you understand what I'm saying, Lenny?

One billion people will depend on what you say and do.

They'll make important decisions, happy or sad, of life or death, in order to obey you, in the name of God.

All of this creates a new perspective.

An immense perspective.

Now, your personal aches, your enormous sufferings, your terrible memories...

It's a harsh thing to say, Lenny, but I have to say it, they must take a back seat.

They are things of this earth.

Do you understand what I'm saying, Lenny?

I know all your sorrows, I've lived with them together with you, I've wept over them with you, but now the time has come for you to let your sorrows to fade, to become irrelevant, distant memories, insignificant, vanquished, destroyed and overpowered by the terrible responsibility that God has given you.

From now on, you are no longer Lenny Belardo, the fatherless, motherless boy.

From now on, you are Pope Pius XIII, Father and Mother of the entire Catholic Church.



Allow me to say, Your Holiness, what joy!

What joy!

The Holy Spirit could not have illumined us in a better manner.

In the name of the entire Church, welcome.

May your pontificate be long, radiant, and fruitful.

Let's settle for long.



What a telling joke!

Jokes are never telling. They're jokes.

Well, Holy father, first of all, a small piece of information of a practical and picturesque nature...

Under your desk, on the right, you will find a button.

If you feel that an encounter is becoming disagreeable or a waste of time, all you have to do is to press it discreetly, and an assistant will swiftly appear with some excuse, liberating you from your engagement.

He'll lie, in other words.

Yes, but he'll have plenty of time and opportunity to repent.



Well, Holy Father, if you agree, I would like to start with our top priorities.

The most urgent of them all is your first homily in Saint Peter's Square.

There is a great deal of agitation about it, something which I, in my long career, have never quite seen before.

The entire office of the Secretary of State is working on it.

 I myself worked all night long on a rough draft, which I would like to submit you.

The press and the faithful who are coming here from every corner of the globe were all convinced that you were going to deliver your homily today.

We did an excellent job at calming their spirits, but at the same time, Your Holiness, I am sorry to say that we can only delay for so long.

Tomorrow would be ideal.

There, this is the most pressing issue.

The most pressing issue is my need for a cup of American coffee.

Would you make me one, Your Eminence?

Certainly. Amatucci.

I didn't ask him.

I asked you.

It will be a pleasure and an honor for me to bring you coffee, Your Holiness.



Thank you, Your Eminence.

It's my duty, Blessed Father.

 

Holy Father, now, about your homily, how would we like to proceed, then?

Later.

And has the Holy Father already thought of some candidates for the delicate role of a special assistant?

I have an idea.

I do too.

Monsignor Gemelli comes to mind...

My idea is Sister Mary.



An admirable idea, Your Holiness, and completely understandable.

Allow me to add, however, that unfortunately, the Curia has complex mechanisms which might seem like astrophysics.

Therefore, the Holy Father's inevitable lack of experience, together with Sister Mary's inevitable lack of experience would lead me to suggest an internal contribution...

Of course I realize how central Sister Mary seems to you.

We could invent a sort of ad hoc role for her.

We won't lack for imagination around here.

Yeah.

You're exactly right, Voiello. She's central.

Sister Mary took me in at her orphanage when I was 7 years old, she raised me and she loved me. She made me a good Christian.

A great Christian!

Monsignor Gemelli is experienced, I would rely on him.

Perhaps you didn't hear me correctly.

Perhaps, Holy Father. My English does have its limits.

You'd better improve it then.

Sister Mary will be my special assistant.

As you wish, Holy Father.

Then, of course, there is the matter of drafting and delivering your address to the College of Cardinals.

They're all still here.

They will not leave the Vatican until you address them.

Later.

In the office of the Secretary, we have been wondering if the Holy Father would care to provide us with some indications regarding the draft of an encyclical.

Later.

The prefects of the various congregations are of course eager to see you with their own eyes.

But I imagine that you would like to deal with this matter... later?

No, now.

First off, I want to meet the Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy.

At any rate, Holy Father, I understand your reluctance about the encyclical.

Your predecessor always made me laugh when he said that... an encyclical is like Proust's In Search of Lost Time.

Everyone quotes it, but no one reads it.





Are you sleeping, Holy Father?

No Your Eminence, I'm praying.

For you.



Stop looking at the Venus of Willendorf in that way.



Holy Father, Holy Father, smoking is not allowed in the papal palace!

Is that so?

Who decided that?

John Paul II.

The Pope?

Yes, the Pope.

There's a new Pope now.

True.

Your Eminence...

Yes, Holy Father.

You're too tied to the past.

They say the same thing about you, Your Holiness.

The past is an enormous place, with all sorts of things inside.

Not so with the present.

The present is merely a narrow opening, with room for only one pair of eyes.

Mine.



Your eminence.

Yes.

Our top priorities.

Here I am. As I was saying...

You will be in charge of politics, finance, theology, appointments and promotions.

I will take care of worldly matters, travel, adulation of the masses, celebrations.

A most effective division of roles, Holy Father.

Your Eminence.

Yes, Blessed Father?

I was just kidding.

That wasn't obvious?

Hardly!

So, as I was saying, our top priorities are... One: the Radio Vatican signal needs boosting. It is unacceptable that reception is so poor. Two: the pope wants to see all the gifts the pope receives. Have a storage facility fitted out for storing all the gifts I receive. Three: the Vatican must immediately buy back the papal tiara from the basilica in Washington DC, which my predecessors, who favoured sobriety over tradition, imprudently let go.

And four...

Sister Mary will also look after you.

She will oversee all your activities and report directly back to me.

She will be your guardian angel.

I'm sixty years, Holy Father.

I don't need a guardian angel.

Oh, we all need a guardian angel, Voiello.

Especially unscrupulous, ambiguous men.

Then, please, allow me to choose mine myself.

In another life.

In this life, the Pope chooses your guardian angel for you.

And he is the Pope.

Did you call for me, Holy Father?



Papa!



It all comes back to this in the end, doesn't it?

To the mother.

How was your mother like, Monsignor Gutierrez?

She was a woman who did not scorn wickedness.

And it had the effect of creating a son full of goodness.

I've inquired about you.

Everyone tells me you are a shining example of goodness.

I thank you for believing them, Holy Father.

It is I who should thank you, for allowing me to be here without hordes of tourists.

That's my duty, Holy Father.

Was it hard? To close off the Basilica to tourists?

No, no, all we had to do was hang up a sign saying closed.



I will never shed my aversion to tourists.

Why is that, Holy Father?

Because they are just passing through.

I was late because I couldn't find your office.

I know. You opened the wrong door and found yourself face to face with some visitors to our museum.

Oh, you've been inquired about me too.

It's very difficult to keep anything secret here in the Vatican.

Rumors fly so quickly that sometimes they arrive even before the event has taken place.

That's quite a useful piece of information for my future.

Which is exactly what it was intended to be, Holy Father.

What is one to do, Monsignor?

It's the times. In America, we call it gossip.

Here in the Vatican we call it calumny.

This way.

 



How many years have you been at the Vatican?

So many that I've stopped to counting.

Do you like it here?

Yes, I feel safe here.

It's as if time were dead.

Speaking of that time, the other day, during the Conclave, I read an Italian newspaper.

It was an article about this politician who had hidden some compromising files in the gaps between the walls of his house.

Yes, I read about that as well.

I thought...

I wouldn't need to hide anything in the gaps in my house.

Because my mind is a gap.

And everything that is hidden from me, sooner or later... is revealed.

As if it were being entrusted to me.

A precious skill for leading the Church.

It's not a skill, Gutierrez... it's my destiny.





Federico, do you know why all the good souls of this world rage against power?

Why, Your Eminence?

Because they simply don't know what it is.

What is it?

Power is knowledge.

What is it you want to know, Eminence?

Who is Pius XIII? Or rather, who was Lenny Belardo?

You need to carry out a small investigation, discreet but thorough.

His week spots, traumas tribulations and sins.

Especially his sins.

Because the sins we commit in the past are the same ones we'll commit in the future.

Because man is like God. He never changes.

I'll start right in.

But is the situation of this papacy already that serious?

No, not yet. But if it were to become so, we'll be ready.

Because the powerful may have knowledge, but they don't realize what it takes to be more powerful than anyone else.

And what does it take?

See how beautiful it is?

It takes getting knowledge before anyone else does.

Fabulous.





Go on, Tommaso, don't be afraid.

But violating the secret of the confessional is...

No, no, it's not.

Not if the information is intended for me, the Pontiff, and is for the survival of our Church.

Don't disappoint me, Tommaso.

Your Holiness, I'm just a poor, simple priest, and the secret of the confessional is the only respectable thing I have.

Today. But think of tomorrow.

Scarlet robes and the ring are in your future.

The cardinalship, my dear. Which is much more respectable.

What if someone hears us?

Only he can hear us up here.

Who knows where he is?

There! By the big dipper.

That's where God's house is.

God's house! What's it like?

Half of a duplex, with a private swimming pool.

Come on now, tell me people's sins.

Well... have I already told you about Voiello's impure thoughts about the Venus of Willendorf?

Yes, yes you told me already. What else?



No, nothing...

Cardinal Aguirre did an imitation of you today, Your Holiness.

Everyone laughed.

Did you laugh?

Yes, but to myself. So no one noticed.

Good. What else?

Everybody is wondering who Sister Mary is to you, what she's doing here.

What else?

Everybody is also wondering: is the Pope thinking about his first homily?

I ask myself the same thing all the time.

Of course I'm thinking about it.

It's all I think about. I even dreamed about it.

I'm let you in on a secret: ever since I was little, I've learned to confound people's ideas on what's going on in my head.

You're so wise, Holy Father.

Not only that, I'm also intransigent, irritable, vindictive... and I have a prodigious memory.

And now I want to make my confession.

Fine. Let's go back downstairs--

No, here.

Before the house of God.

Oh... okay.

In nomine Patris, et Filii et Spiritus Sancti.

God, my conscience does not accuse me, because you do not believe I am capable of repenting.

And therefore, I do not believe in you.

I don't believe you are capable of saving me from myself.

Holy father, what are you saying?

I'm saying that I don't believe in God, Tommaso.

What are you saying, Blessed Father?

Tommaso, Tommaso.

I was joking.

The world has stopped turning. The world has stopped turning.

For days now something has been happening that we haven't seen for a long time.

News and social networks, the front page of newspapers are not focusing on evil anymore, but on good.

Not on war and terrorism, but on love.

And all of this thanks to Pius the 13th's heartbreaking love letters.

The world has stopped turning.

The world has stopped turning.

To talk about love.

Holy Father, you accorded an audience to the head of the Vatican press office.

She's outside waiting.

Are you sure?

Holy Father, the Italian Prime Minister is continuing to postpone legislation on taxing the Vatican and civil unions.

His left-wing supporters are calling for blood.

Many of them claim that you are behind this, that you are the man who changed the Prime Minister's mind.

And I think the same thing.

That might be the case.

How did you do it?

I humiliated him.

You have no idea how many objectives can be obtained by humiliating ones fellow man.

But there's a secret to it.

What is it?

The person humiliated can't realize they'd been humiliated.

If you don't mind my saying so, you're diabolical.

You think? People that know me well actually say that I'm a saint.

How did it go with the Patriarch of Moscow?

The Patriarch of Moscow is more boring than watching golf on television.

So what is our next set of decisions?

Do you remember that on Wednesday you promised to act as a tour guide in the Vatican museums for a third-grade field trip?

God Almighty, what atrocity can I have committed to deserve that?

I don't know if I'll able to make that appointment, on Wednesday I have to watch golf on TV.

Holy Father, you don't want to disappoint the children, do you?

Ma'am, it's the children who have disappointed me.

Didn't you like your childhood?

All I remember of my childhood it is one day it wasn't there anymore.

Clothes pin.

Have we found any confirmation for David Tanistone's statements?

I would say so.

His mother had a brief affair with Archbishop Kurtwell when they were both attending Catholic University in Washington D.C.

Then they drifted apart.

She, like the devout Catholic that she is, decided to give birth to her son.

After a few years and oppressed by the grim economic straits into which she had drifted, she decided to turn to Kurtwell for help.

Which is how Kurtwell came to know him.

But in the meanwhile, a veritable earthquake had devastated that man's personality and the rubble from it collapsed directly onto that young man.

For the rest of the story, we'll have to ask Kurtwell.

I intend to shake things up a little, and I would like to have you become my personal secretary.

Sister Mary has completed her mission and now, justifiably, she wants to move on.

She's completed her mission?

Yes.

The child Pope has become a man.

He once needed a motherly presence, and he now needs a colleague.

What do you think of my proposal?

That I can't accept.

Why not?

Because it would be hypocritical.

What's hypocritical about it?

I'm a hom...

I'm a homosexual, Holy Father.

And you want to expel all homosexuals from the Church.

Every rule has its exceptions.

But I don't subscribe to the exception that you'd make for me.

I don't subscribe to the rule.

It's a huge mistake not to accept homosexuals.

It's a huge mistake to compare them to pedophiles, the way you do.

An unacceptable generalization.

How can you fail to see, you of all people, Holy Father, you, the author of those heartbreaking love letters, that in pedophilia there is only violence, and in homosexuality there's only love?

You say you don't want to be my personal secretary, but, in actual fact, you're already doing the job.

You offer me some advice.

And that's what a personal secretary does.

But in this case, I don't just want to give the advice.

I want you to accept it.

How many things I accept, Gutierrez, and no one notices!

That's a Pope's fate. That's the fate of power.

Try to reason with me: if I ask you to be my personal secretary, am I not already revising my own beliefs about homosexuality?

Or do you actually believe I knew nothing about your homosexuality?

Or the fact that you were sexually abused as a child?

I knew that, too. That's why I sent you to Kurtwell.

That's why I now want you working by my side.

Because we need to work on the future.

You need the right motivations to do that and you have those.

The right motivations can move the world.

You changed.

Since you came back from your trip.

In what way have I changed?

You've transformed fear into anger.

Very good, Gutierrez.

Very good.

I beg of you, confide in me... the wisest thing you have ever learned.

In the end, more than in God, it is necessary to believe in yourself, Lenny.

Have you got something... a little better?

That's a banal platitude.

If only you knew how true a banal platitude can be, my dear colleague.

After all, look at us, we are power.

And power is a banal platitude.

We will be dealing with you one day, Your Holiness.

What do you mean?

You're going to be a saint! I'm perfectly serious.

I don't need any more steps in my career.

Your prayers, Holy Father, your prayers move God.

When?

Let's stick to the facts and skip the memorable account of what you did at age fourteen in the room of the gravely sick wife of the custodian who was suddenly cured.

Now then, here are the simple facts.

Esther and Peter were infertile, sterile, barren.

The young woman confided in you. And you, Holy Father, you didn't tell her to do what anyone else would have said: go see a doctor.

No, instead Your Holiness prayed and Esther became pregnant and she gave birth a beautiful child.

Moreover, it became clear that Sister Antonia was actually an unworthy woman, an evildoer.

And you had the power to remove her from her position, you had the power to punish her, all you had to do was to sign a document, but instead, you chose not to do that.

Instead you chose to pray in the rain, kneeling on the asphalt at a rest stop on the highway, and at that moment Sister Antonia shuffled off the stage thanks to a divine punishment.

Now, these are the things that saints do.

They are moved by a faith so solid that they believe in God, in the power of God, before they believe in the power of human beings.

As you see, Holy Father, miracles are more likely to happen.

We only need to keep our ears open.

Are your ears always open for the Blessed Juana?

Always.

When she was fifteen she went to see the children at the hospital and always brought tangerines with her.

And she didn't care whether they ate them or not.

But she wanted them to peel them and to play at squeezing the peels, and spray each other with the bright and unforgettable scent of that fruit.

Then she told the children: I will go away from you and you will go away from me, but it doesn't matter, because all that we left on this earth is the scent of goodness.

I could listen for hours.

This story tells us something important.

What?

That goodness, unless it's combined with imagination, runs the risk of being mere exhibitionism.

How true! How true!

If you want to know everything about the Blessed Juana, there's a wonderful opportunity that we could take advantage of.

You see, every Christmas, the miracle children, who are now in their fifties, gather at a plaza in Guatemala City and tell the story of their miracle cures.

I've attended and it was a very moving and unforgettable experience.

I mean, everyone would be overjoyed to have you there.

Are you suggesting I spend my Christmas in Guatemala?

Yes. It would be a memorable gesture.

All right, then, we'll go to Guatemala.

On the understanding that it will be a small and private get-together, without crowds and without press.

Just us and the miracle children.

It will all be exactly as you wish.

All right, children, today we are going on tour of the Vatican Museums and I am gonna be your tour guide.

Earlier it was snowing. Now it's raining.

Too bad!

Snow is so much nicer than rain, isn't it?

Yes.

But if it's raining, that can only mean you've been bad children.

Why?

Why?

Because raindrops are the tears of Christ.

And if Jesus is crying, that can only mean you've made him angry.

What...

Hey, I was just kidding, have a sense of humor, for Pete's sake!

All right, children, here's what we'll do.

Right now we're all going to eat hamburgers and French fries and after lunch we'll continue our tour of the museums.

Follow me!

Aren't you going to eat hamburgers and French fries?

My mommy wants me to stick to the Mediterranean diet.

I understand.

I don't want a mommy with a beard.

You need to learn to settle for what you get.

I don't want to settle.

You're right.

I don't want to settle anymore, either.

How are you?

Who, me?

I'm always in a good mood.

I've always associated good mood with stupidity.

And not without reason, Your Holiness.

However you can't imagine the amount of energy that comes from good mood and stupidity.

What did you want to tell me?

I wanted to update you on a survey in the magazine Catholic Universe that I've been publishing for eight years.

What is it about?

We asked a question to a mixed group of people: if they'd like to attend a sermon of the Pope face to face.

How many?

99% of all Catholics.

And would this change things?

No, Your Holiness. It wouldn't change things.

A Pope doesn't change people.

Well, then you're confirming that there is no good reason for me to appear in public.

No, actually yes, there is a reason.

And what would that be?

If you appear in public, it would help these people to be in a good mood.

I'm not a comedian.

That doesn't matter.

It's the show of being there that helps people to be in a good mood.

That's not my duty.

Yes. Yes, it is.

Your Holiness...

You've changed a lot since you began your papacy.

Affliction changes us, Aguirre.

But good mood doesn't.

Accipe anulum de manu Petri et noveris dilectione Principis Apostolorum dilectionem tuam erga Ecclesiam roborari.

Amen.

What happened to your hands, our Eminence?

Oh, Holy Father...

The cold in Alaska, when I say Mass in the open air.

Haven't you tried using skin creams?

I'm allergic.

And then there is the rheumatism.

These look like the hands of Christ on the cross.

God blesses you, Holy Father.

I can't even hold a glass any more.

That man's name was Jack Walser, he was the superintendent of the building where we lived, before the Lord called me to Him.

He had divided the tenants into two categories, the natives and the nomads.

My family belonged to the category of the nomads, because we didn't have enough money to ensure the stability enjoyed by the natives.

One day, Jack rang our door bell at ten in the morning, confident that I would be at school.

But that day I was at home in bed with fever.

The door to my room was open and he stretched out on the little sofa where my father sat when he listened to the radio.

He drenched it with his wet clothes.

And he, he told me that the party was over for us nomads that, that landlords had decided to double the rent.

And he said it as if he had something good, something fragrant in his mouth.

And then he gestured for me to come closer... and he said to me, in a tone of voice I'd never heard in my life, he said:

On your knees.

At last... he said the most vulgar phrase I've ever heard in my life. He said:

There are only two reasons a human being would get down on his knees.

And one is to pray, and the other is to know himself.

I was only twelve years old, Holy Father.

I was twelve years old!

You need to continue, Archbishop.

Your story isn't finished yet.

What... What else do you want to know?

What happened afterward?

You want to know whether I, as an adult, became like Jack Walser.

Certainly, that's all you care about.

What do you care about that twelve-year-old boy on his knees in front of a man with wet clothes on a chilly day in February in 1955!

We care, Archbishop, about all children.

All of them.

Fine.

Let's get on with it.

Yes, Holy Father, for the rest of my life...

I've behaved like Jack Walser.

Can that be enough?

Come here, Archbishop.

I've made my decision.

I'm sending you back to the United States.

Where do you want to go?

To New York.

I want to go home.

Fine.

Holy Father, infinite is your compassion.

Infinite is your capacity for forgiveness.

I have one simple request.

Anything, Your Holiness.

I wanna make sure you really do wanna go home.

So I want you to plant your finger on New York on the globe.

Kechikan, Alaska.

I know the place.

Very nice.

A small town of 8,000 inhabitants that's so cold that it'll split your fingers.

But in the words of the Nobel laureate Brodsky:

Beauty at low temperatures is beauty.

Archbishop Kurtwell, your disease has deceived you.

There's a rumor going around that I'm about to leave the Vatican.

You have to admit the rumors that circulate in the Vatican almost always correspond to the truth.

Where will I go?

Where you've always wanted to be.

With children.

You're an orphan.

Orphans want to stay with children forever.

How do you know I'm an orphan?

I've always known.

How do you know?

It's difficult, for a saint, to answer all the questions of humanity.

Can I start calling you Lenny again?

Only if I can call you Ma.

Yes, you can call me Ma.

Where will I go?

To Africa, to take Sister Antonia's place.

And there you will be in charge of the other 250 Villages of Goodness.

I'd like to open new ones just for the children.

What do you think?

I think it's a good idea.

In the end, we all have to go back to where we began.

And you, when will you go back to where you began?

Where did I begin?

You began with two hippie parents.

I've stopped searching for my parents.

I've stopped searching for God.

Never say that again.

The truth is you've never searched.

You've been hiding yourself.

When do you want me to leave?

Tomorrow morning.

Before you go, if you like, you can say goodbye to the Cardinal Secretary of State.

So long, saint.

So long, Ma.

Your Holiness, don't you feel well?

No, no. Just a passing discomfort.

Should I call the doctor?

No, no, it's nothing serious.

It's over.

Are you certain you don't want me to call the doctor?

All better now.

Do you believe in God?

I... yes, I do.

I don't.

Those who believe in God don't believe anything.

You already knew I had fallen in love with that woman, didn't you?

Of course you knew it.

I'm an open book to you.

And here we are again at the same age-old question: who ever said that a man can't love God and a woman at the same time?

That's bullshit.

There's one thing I've never understood about you: whether you're a Lazio fan like your father or whether you root for Napoli like I do.

You're unclear on this point.

What?

You want to know what became of Tonino Pettola?

Look, well... Tonino Pettola... what happened is that...

Jesus, what an unseemly thing!

I didn't want to, but the Pope...

Basically, Tonino Pe...

Oh God, I was about to tell you!

No, my friend. You'll have to forgive me. But I...

I can't tell anyone what became of Tonino Pettola.

Forgive me, but I can't even tell you, and you're my best friend.

There are certain secrets so important that only one person should know them.

Don't resent me for this. I love you like the son I never had.

But I can never reveal to you what became of Tonino Pettola.

Merry Christmas, Girolamo.

You know? You were right.

When an orphan matures, he may discover a fresh youth within.

And at that point, he will have something to say.

You have something to say, I know it, I feel it, and you will say it.

Your Holiness, you will say it... you'll say it.

You will say it.

You'll say it. You'll say it.

You'll say it, you'll say it, you will say it, you'll say it, you'll say it, you'll say it, you'll say it.

You have a very tight family, Eminence, very affectionate.

It has been a lovely Christmas Eve.

May I be indiscreet, Your Holiness, and say something that concerns you personally?

You may.

Your parents abandoned you when you were a child.

Nothing so strange about that, one might feel constrained to abandon a child for all sorts of reasons.

There is no evidence to suggest they are dead.

You become one of the most famous people on the planet, but they do not get in touch with you.

Why? I asked myself.

A guilty conscience, perhaps?

But the prospect of a reconciliation should be more powerful than any sense of guilt.

So what explanation did you come up with, then?

A very simple one.

They were hippies.

Presumably they hold the same libertarian and progressive opinions today as they had then.

And you become the worldwide champion of ideas that run completely counter to theirs.

So you're saying the reason they didn't reach out to me is a difference in political opinion?

I'm saying that whoever had the courage to abandon a child might also find the strength to repudiate him.

Holy Father, the plane is on the tarmac, waiting for us.

Whenever you like, it's all ready.

We aren't going to Guatemala after all.

The miracle people of the Blessed Juana will be so disappointed.

Yes, they will.

But in time they'll understand.

All I ever wanted when I was a child was to be a cardinal.

What about you, Holy Father, what did you want to be when you were a child?

I wanted to be a child.

And now where is God?

In Venice.

In Venice?

And where does he live there?

That's something I have to find out.

Sorry, sorry.

Please.

Excuse me, sir.

Please.

Thank you. Thank you. Excuse me.

Holy Father...

I got you something stupid, it has no real worth, but I saw it and I thought of you.

It says here you can see more than 100 metres.

Holy Father, the manager of the restaurant and all the staff wonder if you'd be willing to give a benediction.

They're all behind you waiting.

If you were to turn around, for them it would be something of a minor miracle.

No.

That would be an exhibition.

When they asked her: Who is God?

God is a line that opens, replied the Blessed Juana, she was just fourteen years old, and no one understood what it was she was trying to say.

And then, all the children asked the dying Blessed Juana dozens of questions: are we dead or are we alive?

Are we tired or are we vigorous?

Are we healthy or are we sick?

Are we good or are we bad?

Do we still have time or has it run out?

Are we young or are we old?

Are we clean or are we dirty?

Are we fools or are we smart?

Are we true or are we false?

Are we rich or are we poor?

Are we kings or are we servants?

Are we good or are we beautiful?

Are we warm or are we cold?

Are we happy or are we blind?

Are we disappointed or are we joyful?

Are we lost or are we found?

Are we men or are we women?

It doesn't matter, replied the Blessed Juana as she lay dying at the age of just eighteen.

And she added, on the verge of death, with tears in her eyes:

God does not allow Himself to be seen.

God does not shout.

God does not whisper.

God does not write.

God does not hear.

God does not chat.

God does not comfort us.

And all the children asked her:

Who is God?

And Juana replied:

God smiles.

And only then did everyone understand.

And now, I beg all of you, smile.

Smile.

Smile.

That's right, smile.

It's nothing, it's nothing!

One day I will die... and I will finally... be able to embrace you all.

One by one.

Yes.

I will.

I have faith that I will.

Call the doctor.


God isn't for you Lenny.

God is for men who have no use for freedom.

You're wrong about abortion.

You're spreading a sorrow you don't even understand.

And that's the worst thing a human being can do.

You've made the kind of mistake that should be avoided at all costs introducing concepts that taken by themselves are true, but which, when lumped together, constitute a system that's overly rigid.

When it comes to abortion, rigidity is the only option: there's no getting around it.

It's a crime, forbidden and punished in the book of Exodus Chapter 21, verses 22-25, you know that.

22: When men have a fight and injured a pregnant woman and she suffers a miscarriage, but no further injury, the guilty one shall be fined as much as the woman's husband demands and he shall pay in the presence of the judges.

23: But if injury ensues, you shall pay life for life, 24, eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot.

25 burn for burn, wound for wound, stripe for stripe.

The Church has always maintain this tradition and... it is only modern laxity that wishes to turn sins into rights.

Not to encourage them, no one is actually in favor of abortion, but to undermine the principle of authority.

Oh, come on Lenny, you know these verses are a little more complicated than that: yes, the litigant pays damages in case of an abortion or suffers death if the woman dies in the course of losing the baby, but that's not what it is about, this is about compassion, empathy.

Bouvier? Are you seriously going to waste my time... with the Bouvier's nonsense? Post-revolutionary France?

Or the bullshit of St. Alphonsus?

It isn't bullshit, Lenny.

That abortion is a grave moral disorder is not open for debate.

That's what St. John Paul II said, and those three words, grave, moral and disorder are based on papal infallibility.

And yet, in 1591, Pope Gregory XIV, with the Sedes Apostolica bull restricted excommunication to the abortion of an ensouled fetus, introducing a distinction... that argues against lumping together disparate situations I'm sick and tired of distinctions.

Even for St. Thomas Aquinas, and right up until the middle of the nineteenth century, abortion was set to take place only after the ensoulment of the fetus, and that occurs in the third month of pregnancy.

Science is the gift of God and God taught us that ovulation is spontaneous.

Ask a woman about that: back when it was still believed that there were two kinds of insemination, male insemination involving sperm, female insemination involving eggs, it was considered a sin not to give a woman pleasure.

But then, when it was discovered that ovulation was spontaneous, the cost was several billion female orgasms.

But it made the psychoanalysts rich.

The one profession that involves no work and a great deal of money that we let slip through our fingers.

I implore you Lenny, reconsider your position on abortion.

Tough in principle, soft in practice.

Abortion is saying no to life.

Who gives a damn about life?

Life is not some stupid centerpiece on the side table of nothingness.

Life is meant to be used, and to be used well, to love and be loved.

And let me remind you what St. Alphonsus said about abortion:

In an abortion everyone is guilty, except for the woman.

And what if that wasn't only true of abortion?

What if in the things of life everyone is guilty, except for the woman?

Are you talking about your mother?

Who else could I be talking about?

What is happening to me today?

At ten o'clock, Robert Lee, the new chairman of the Tea Party.

At 11:15, a brief meeting with the chancellor of Stanford University.

At one o'clock, lunch with the governor to fine-tune plans for the evening's events.

How long has it been since you've seen your father?

He's no longer my father, he's only my governor.

Don't you miss him?

He doesn't miss me, I don't miss him.

I miss everyone.

But more than anyone else, the person I miss is...

Mr. Jack Walser, he was the superintendent of the building where we lived, before the Lord called me to Him.

He had divided the tenants into two categories, the natives and the nomads.

One day, Jack rang our door bell at ten in the morning, confident that Lucy and I would be at school, but that day we were in bed sick with a fever, happy to be safe at home.

Through the bedroom door I saw my mother offer him a cup of coffee, which Jack drank it standing up, because he didn't want to get the chair wet with his rain-drenched clothes.

No doubt, there was something bad he'd come to say, something important.

And then, Mr. Walser announced to my mother that the landlords had decided to implement a substantial rent hike with... with a caress.

Yeah...

With a caress... that never really happened, but that still come close to... brashing against my mother's drab hair, to my hair, to Lucy's and the hair of our father lying in a hotel somewhere in the city with his lover in his arms.

Listening to the rain... the way we were.

We nomads moved out the apartment at night, so we wouldn't be seen by the natives, but at the bottom of the stairs Mr. Walser was waiting, and he shook our hands, one by one, and he said something to me that I've never understood, which is why I still remember it.

He said to me: Always get a seat in the back of the train, because it's the safer.

Why does our Spanish persecutor not go home to his Pope?

I couldn't say.

What does he doing here?

He walks, he drinks, he sleeps, he drinks, he walks, he drinks.

Ah, he's battling against death, which is the least interesting of any of the battles we have ever summoned to fight.

It's too late.

It's too late for what?

For everything, Your Eminence.

Hello, Pete, have you five minutes for me?

Sure, Father Gutierrez.

I was just wondering if you'd had a chance to think it over.

Yeah, I've thought it over.

And I decided I'm not gonna press charges against Archbishop Kurtwell.

Why, why not?

None of the others filed charges, but at least they got plenty of cash.

You didn't even get that.

And have you ever asked yourself why they took the money and I didn't?

No, I haven't. Why didn't you?

Because I have my dignity.

Fine.

So... if you have so much dignity, file charges against that man.

That man is evil incarnate.

Why are you crying, now? Pete, you know I'm right.

Bernardo. Can I call you Bernardo?

Yes, of course you can.

Forget about me.

Hi, Freddy.

Ciao, Bernardo.

How is training coming along?

I've been gradually intensifying.

Nice.

Did you think over my proposal?

What proposal?

What do you mean, what proposal?

The idea of you giving me a hand in nailing Kurtwell.

That worm just drools when he sees you.

Not me.

I drool when I see you, Bernardo.

All you'd have to do is go out with him one night.

You could just stop before things went too far, and in the meantime I'd find a hiding place and take pictures.

Freddy, Freddy, you're my last hope.

Bernardo, you are gonna leave here when you're done.

But I have to spend the rest of my life here, do you understand?

I can't afford to cross a man like Kurtwell.

He's one of the most powerful men in Queens.

You can understand that, right?

Don't resent me for it, Bernardo.

I never resent anyone.

That's my main problem.

Hello, Freddy.

What do you want, Freddy?

Just tell me what you want and you'll have it.

I want to become a great tennis player and win a Grand Slam.

Fine, then you'll have it.

Get out of here, asshole.

But...

They've told me the date. It's for next week.

It's just one day of the year, Rose, an ordinary date.

They're going to empty me out, Bernardo.

They've given me a 60% chance of dying, 40% chance of living.

And if I refuse, I can't even begin to guess my life expectancy.

But I'm not gonna refuse, because I need to start running in this hotel again and I can't keep doing it from here, through six silent security monitors.

Isn't it nice to live silent and flat on your back?

No, it's horrible.

We all deserve the right to start over, Bernardo.

But you know what the funny thing is?

What is it?

How I'll leave this place.

How will you leave?

Through there.

They're going to tear down the wall, turn it all into one giantic window, and out I'll go, dangling in midair, lifted by a crane.

It'll be a spectacular sight.

I'll be so ashamed.

I have to go now.

I'm going to write to the Pope.

It sounds so surreal, when you put it that way.

I'd like to put together a press release categorically denying the rumors about murky relations between you and Kurtwell.

A press release that states loud and clear: this Pope is blackmail proof.

If, as you say, this Pope is blackmail proof, there's no need to say so.

That's the point, Holy Father.

On a strictly confidential basis, I need to know myself: can Kurtwell blackmail you in any way?

Lenny... you think you're the hinge.

But you're the door.

Sancta Maria, Mater Dei...

I love you all!

Where have Esther, Peter, and little Pius gone?

To Ostia.

They're living in a house by the beach.

Peter is a private security guard now.

Weren't they happy here?

Holy Father... life in the Vatican is not much fun for young people.

Holy Father?

Yes.

Everyone here says that you are a saint.

Calumny.

Show me where you live.

When you want to, you can come home.

But I haven't accomplished anything with Kurtwell.

Doesn't matter. Come home.

I'll be waiting.

Archbishop, your diocese is currently undertaking numerous projects aimed at revitalizing the neighbourhood.

Can you give us more details about that?

Well, we have put a lot of money and time over the years on this neighbourhood.

And I think that through sports, well, we'll be able to make a contact with the youth on the area and, and to help instill in them some of the values consistent with Christian life.

Among the many sports projects that your diocese supports, many involved tennis. Why tennis specifically?

Oh well, I, I love tennis.

It's been a lifelong passion of mine, and you probably didn't know but this area is very famous for tennis for a long time, and I think that tennis just offers a chance for excellence instructions of a man soul.

The elements of tennis are concentration, self-worth, and a lot of things that go in to making a great tennis-player.

And you know it's the responsibility of the Church to help these children to grow up...

Hic est enim calix sanguinis mei, novi et aeterni testamenti mysterium Fidei.

Qui pro vobis et pro multis effundetur in remissionem peccatorum.

Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in mei memoriam facietis.

Yes, I'd be glad to.

Okay.

What's your name?

David.

David what?

Just David.

Why are you following me?

I used to skate only on the weekends, and only with my family.

Then one night we were having dinner and my daughter Kate, who was twelve at the time, says that that meal... was like being in a shark tank.

That's what my wife and I had become: a shark tank.

Now I skate alone, even during the week, but... it's not the same anymore.

Tanistone is my last name.

And it was my mother's last name too.

Why are you following me?

Haven't you discovered yet?

You're the missing link between me and the source of all my problems.

What's going on?

Why are you and the Holy Father so determined to get me?

Because for years you were so determined to get all those innocent children.

That's libel of slander.

And I could bring you up on charges tomorrow morning.

You don't have any solid evidence against me.

What else do you want?

What does Pius XIII want from me?

The Holy Father wants from you a statement that resembles the truth.

The truth is I know Lenny Belardo very well.

We shared power in New York for years.

And the truth is he has always envied me.

He envies me my charisma, because he lacks that quality.

That's the one and only statement that resembles the truth.

Be-- be reasonable, please.

The Pope has no reason to envy a sick old priest who's devastated by very grave accusations.

Your thesis doesn't hold together.

Let me reveal something to you, Father Gutierrez: you don't matter.

Not at all.

You can stay in Queens 'til the day I die, and it won't change a thing.

The Pope can't get to the bottom of things with me and he knows that perfectly well.

Because it would lead to pure pandemonium.

I pity you, Gutierrez, because you're just a bit player and a cheap piece of amateur theatricals organized by your Pope.

David...

...is Kurtwell your father?

Do you remember that girl that was skating, this evening?

That was a moment.

Because only you and I saw that, out of the whole world.

I felt close to you.

I sensed that your despair was the same as mine.

That was the moment I thought to myself: I trust this man.

Yes, I, I thought, here's a good man.

And I'm a good man, too.

So I'll tell that good man the things he wants to know.

Yes, Kurtwell...

...is my father.

But that's not the point.

The point is the horror.

I'm not afraid of dying, but because I suffer from vertigo, I'm afraid of being swung out of this place through that hole in the wall and being dangled in mid-air.

Don't worry.

I'll be there to comfort you.

Then I'll go back to Rome.

You're going back to Rome?

Yes.

I'm done with my work here.

You come say goodbye to me now.

But I'm not leaving yet.

No, no, you come say goodbye to me now.

Breathe, Bernardo, I'm the one who's going to die.

Rose, please...

Bernardo, we're breathing the same air.

All of you, leave now.

No, not you, Lenny.

Tell it to me, just this one time.

Let me die knowing I didn't believe in God in vain.

Tell it to me, Lenny.

All right.

Let's go say hello to Billy.

I'd rather not. I'm scared.

But we must. Billy is a friend of yours.

His mother is dying and he needs the comfort you can give him.

Thanks for coming, Sister Mary. Please.

Billy, your friends are here.

Come, let me get you something.

Sister Mary, can I go see Billy's mother for a minute?

I'd like to pray beside her.

Of course.

Lord, we must talk about Billy's mother now.

We must talk, You and I. And no one else can hear.

Billy's mother is still alive.

Your mother is still alive too.

And you'll find her.

Now... at last...

...time to die.

Bring me back.

Bring me back!

To what do I owe the honor of your presence?

I have orders to accompany you to the Vatican, where you'll be given a fair trial.

We have a flight for Rome tomorrow afternoon.

It'll only be a big waste of time. For me and for you.

You don't have any solid evidence, you and your Pope.

None.

Only the demented reavings of a lunatic who goes around with orange hair.

No one will believe you. No one.

We don't just have that testimony.

Really?

What do you think you have?

This is Kurtwell...

Hello, Lenny.

Even though you let it ring and ring, I know that you were waiting for my call.

Do you really want me to come to Rome to be subjected to a trial and found guilty?

I'm afraid it's absolutely necessary.

Then one second after I land in Rome, you are gonna see all the things I have on you on all the newspapers of the world.

Go right ahead.

The world would probably like it.

The world is always ready for love.

This is Archbishop Kurtwell. Is this a bad time?

That depends.

I have some confidential information about the Pope.

And I have proof.

To be perfectly frank, it's more than information, these are ticking time bombs.

In that case, this is a very good time, especially for a journalist.

What's the subject?

I'm not talking about it on the phone.

Do you see the kind of things we're talking about here?

Letters that our Pope wrote to his...

Californian girlfriend over the years.

We have a Pope with a very active emotional life.

Where did you find them?

I took over a position that was previously held by Belardo.

I took over his desk.

Belardo made the error of leaving these letters at the back of a drawer.

Have you read them all?

Only the pertinent passages.

The steamy ones.

The ones that prove that Belardo has had a woman for years.

You should have read them all, and with care.

In this last one, he states he'll never send these letters to that woman because he's married to God.

Do you have any evidence that they were ever mailed?

Any envelopes with canceled stamps?

No, no, I don't.

Well, in that case, my good Archbishop Kurtwell, you don't have any news for me.

No bomb. No scandal.

A stack of love letters that were never mailed isn't news.

It's strictly literature.

Pack the bags, call the chauffeur.

You no longer have a car.

I put in a request to have it confiscated.

The Cardinal Secretary of State accepted my request.

We're going to take the train to the airport.

On one condition.

What condition?

That we sit in the last car on the train.

It's the safest.

What is more beautiful, my love?

Love lost or love found?

Don't laugh at me, my love.

I know it, I'm awkward and naive when it comes to love, and I ask questions straight out of a pop song.

This doubt overwhelms me and undermines me, my love.

To find...

Hey, Daniel.

...or to lose?

How do I look?

All around me, people don't stop yearning.

Did they lose or did they find?

I can't say.

An orphan has no way of knowing.

An orphan lacks a first love. The love for his mama and papa.

That's the source of his awkwardness, his naivet.

You said to me, on that deserted beach in California, you can touch my legs.

But I didn't do it.

There, my love, is love lost.

That's why I've never stopped wondering, since that day: where have you been?

Where you are now?

And you, shining gleam of my misspent youth, did you lose or did you find?

I don't know.

And I will never know.

I can't even remember your name, my love.

And I don't have the answer.

But this is how I like to imagine it, the answer.

In the end, my love, we have no choice.

We have to find.

All right love bugs.

Mommy is gonna show you something that you didn't know mommy can do.

Lord Almighty, now that You have our beloved Dussolier in Your arms, I pray to You, remind him of that afternoon when we ran away together from the orphanage.

Remind him of the fear and freedom we felt on that rainy afternoon.

And reassure him, there's nothing wrong, freedom and fear are always together, like an old married couple, each willing to die for the other.

Remind him of Sister Mary at age twenty, her hair flowing and blonde and drenched in sunlight as she ran and sank baskets.

Remind him of that indelible, archaic picture of beauty that so stirred us, in silence.

Now I know very well that neither he nor I will ever forget that picture.

Remind him, Lord Almighty, of all our endless late-night conversations, in that big one-room dormitory, under the blankets, how we whispered in secret about our one and only, inexhaustible topic of discussion: our future.

We were children then, and that's what children do: they paint the future in colors that reality can never know.

Remind him not to grieve over all our shattered dreams.

We wanted to live the lives of the great baseball player, the elderly gas station attendant on the county road, the heroic soldier, the lowlife New York musician, the fireman, the blue-water sailor.

Remind him not to weep when he remembers that instead we lived only the simple, drab life of the priest, such a strange life, a life of hope and prayer that You, Lord Almighty, really do exist and might think about us.

Amen.

subtitles: sookie sync &amp; corrections: othelo

Sancta Maria, Mater Dei.

Where do they go, the airplanes we never take?

I always wonder the same thing, every time I see one.

I always think that they go to places I've never been.

They go somewhere else.

Tell me about the Blessed Juana.

She is revered in Guatemala and across all Central America.

She died at the age of eighteen and, of leukemia and on her deathbed, she said:

All the world will be infatuated with me because... all my life I have been infatuated with the world.

What did the Blessed Juana do to deserve canonization?

Well, she cared for sick children in the hospitals and, in order to alleviate their suffering, she would tell them fairytales that she thought up herself, very amusing ones, apparently, and always with the same protagonist, the Madonna.

I like this, go on.

But these fairytales gave more than a smile to the sick children.

Many of these children, just a few days after listening to Juana's fairytales, recovered from terminal illnesses.

And they recovered with a smile on their face.

All of the cured children, when they were asked whether they had any idea of why they felt better and were healed, gave the same answer:

The Madonna made us laugh.

That's a wonderful story, Your Eminence.

Yes, Holy Father, it's a wonderful story.

Beautiful... if only it were true.

But Holy Father, it is true.

All right, let me think about it. I'll let you know my answer soon.

Tell me about your calling.

Holy Father, the announcement of your orders making abortion unforgivable has unleashed the Femen and they're protesting everywhere.

Beneath the Eiffel Tower, in the European parliament, even in St. Peter's Square.

I don't want to talk about people who strip naked in order to protest against something.

The death of Andrew... you weren't to blame.

Oh, yes I was.

Valente.

Holy Father.

I am so tired.

Here I am, Holy Father.

Make yourself comfortable.

Did you have a good trip?

Oh, I just love helicopters.

They make me feel like I'm having an adventure.

Young people like you love adventures.

Holy Father, may I remind you that we're the same age?

We used to be the same age.

I was so surprised and happy to hear that you wanted to see me.

I too was surprised to learn that I needed to see you.

Oh, not wanted, but needed.

Weigh your words carefully, Holy Father.

I'm really tired, you know that?

If you will allow me, Holy Father, you're not tired.

You're grieving and struggling with guilt over the death of your closest friend, Cardinal Dussolier.

What did you want to talk to me about, Holy Father?

What are we doing wrong?

Oh, it's very simple.

We've failed to follow the eternal, unchanging principle of the carrot and the stick.

The carrot and the stick.

We brought the stick but forgot the carrot.

What do you mean by carrot?

An opening.

What do you mean by an opening?

A speech about love and a pastoral voyage.

I don't like to travel and you know perfectly well that I don't like to be seen.

I never said that you have to let yourself be seen.

As for traveling: everyone dislikes traveling until they actually go on a trip.

Then they like it, don't they?

Where are you thinking of dragging me?

To Africa.

To celebrate the thirtieth anniversary of the foundation of Sister Antonia's first village of goodness.

The first of the 250 villages of goodness.

The largest multinational of charity.

Sister Antonia calls my office an average of fourteen times a day to repeat her invitation.

She'd gladly saw off one of her arms to get you to come.

Well, you just tell her to get to sawing, and then I'll be around sooner or later.

So what do you say?

I'm not particularly fond of Sister Antonia and what's more, several cardinals have told me she has a close and friendly relationship with halitosis.

No.

This doesn't strike me as the right idea to settle the problems we have.

As you wish, Holy Father.

What I really wish is to go back to Rome.

I'm not a man who's comfortable on vacation.

All intelligent men are uncomfortable on vacation.

By the way, something that may possibly cheer you up: Elmore Coen, your favorite author, is on vacation in Rome.

He stated in an interview with the press that he'd like to meet you.

Might that be of interest to you?

I've always wanted to meet Elmore Coen.

What became... of the roller-skating children?

I've loved all your books, Mr. Coen.

It's an immense honor for me to meet you.

Let's not get ahead of ourselves, Your Holiness.

After all, you're the Pope.

I had heard that you wanted to meet me too.

How could I not?!

You are the most mysterious man of these first few decades of the century.

What writer wouldn't want to meet you?

You writers are all so obsessed with mystery.

You men of the cloth. Don't kid around, either.

Writers and men of the cloth are the same in that way.

They can't afford to solve the mystery, because the next day they'd become irrelevant.

Writing is the one way I've found of concealing my boundless ignorance.

It's a fraud, really, the way of gaining acceptance from the world and especially from women, who are my one and only real interest.

Oh, forgive me, I've been inappropriate.

Not at all.

Laymen always think we priests are scandalized by even the slightest things, whereas the truth is the exact opposite.

We are never scandalized, no profession has to deal with sin on such a continual basis as ours.

The confessional is our operating room.

Just as surgeons have no fear of blood, so we priests are no longer afraid of scandal and sin.

So how do you survive without women?

An easy answer.

The foolish ones go with women on the sly.

The wise ones long ago understood the degree to which s*x, as a source of pleasure, has overvalued in our society.

Your Holiness, with a few words you have just razed to the ground three quarters of my literary production.

I've almost always written about s*x as the motor that drives the world.

And you were right. But you don't write about motors that purr, you write about motors that break down continuously.

And they should have given you a Nobel Prize for it, 20 years ago.

Ah, it's true.

Unfortunately, they've gotten into the habit of giving it only to those who don't want it.

Have you ever had a girlfriend, Your Holiness?

Certainly!

I've only have had one and I remember everything about her.

Whereas you, Mr. Coen, have probably had thousands and don't remember a thing about them.

I only remember certain perverse... and lustful details.

If you remember those, that's probably because we're continuing lecturing you about how wrong it is to remember them.

How do you feel?

Sick.

They've found something wrong with me, but they're not sure what it is.

Perhaps God has entered you.

The more than likely it's the devil.

Are you going to resign?

No, I'm not going to resign.

That only makes me feel worse.

You're never going to be pope, Michael. Get used to it.

I'm the Pope and I'm going to remain pope until the day I die.

Because I'm curious to see how it all turns out.

You don't believe in God.

What did you say?

I said you don't believe in God.

I was fifty years old myself once, you know?

I had my own crisis of faith.

Like all priests.

The second calling is more challenging, and more fraught than the first.

You no longer have to deal with the enthusiastic of youth, now you must grapple with disenchantment and the limitations of the rational.

You don't believe in God but that shouldn't upset you.

Even though you're a pope.

There's still another path that'll allow you to find the people and things you are looking for, even if you can't see it now... because all you can see before you now are your own doubts and the darkness.

Please, show me this other path, I beg you.

If I show it to you, then the adventure is over.

Don't you see, Lenny?

Your life, your Papacy, is an unforgettable adventure?

You truly are my spiritual father, the best a priest could hope to have.

Michael, what must I do to restore the Church's fate?

Go to Venice and bury two empty coffins.

Gloria Patri et Filio et Spiritui Sancto, Requiem aeternam dona eis, Domine, Requiescant in pace.

Dominus vobiscum, Sit nomen Domini benedictum.

Adiutorium nostrum in nomine Domini.

Benedicat vos ompipotens Deus: Pater, et Filius, et Spiritus Sanctus.

Now... next Sunday... we won't see each other, my dear, devoted faithful.

I have to take a trip.

I've decided to visit Africa.

To celebrate the thirtieth anniversary of the foundation of Sister Antonia's first village of goodness.

I know! I know you wanted him, not me.

When will he come out?

I'll tell you right away, so you can get it out of your mind: he's not coming out.

What does that mean: he's not coming out?

In that case, why are we bothering to all travel together on the same flight?

To feel he's closer.

Sofie, you know perfectly well that this bullshit won't sell anymore.

Boys, what can I tell you? He's not coming out.

That's the official version. Then, I, I couldn't say...

Anything could happen, one thing Pius XIII certainly doesn't lack is unpredictability.

Take this trip... in two hours he told us: we're going.

And we put the whole thing together at the speed of light.

But I'm going to ask him a really important question.

Not right now, you're not.

But why won't he come out?

What is he doing?

He's praying.

And we're praying, too: that he'll talk to us.

We have been praying for months now.

So what prayer is he praying?

My dear boy, I still can't read the Holy Father's mind.

Well, he's not praying aloud. With this pope, that constitutes news.

I have an important question to ask him.

I understand, Jennifer, but he's not coming out.

Prince Abadi has prepared the stadium for the Pope's public speech. Will he go?

Will he allow himself to be seen in public for the first time?

He said he will. In any case, I'll keep you informed. Ok?

Sofie, when am I'm gonna be able to ask my question?

I don't know, Jennifer.

Holy Father, reliable sources say that the Kurtwell investigation is at a standstill.

They say that you've sent a man with no experience to conduct that investigation because you don't actually want to investigate.

And there's a very specific reason for that: Kurtwell is blackmailing you.

Is that true, Holy Father?

And what is Kurtwell blackmailing you about?

What does Kurtwell know about you that we don't?

Stay where you are! Nobody move! Stay where you are!

Stay where you are! Stay where you are! Nobody move!

Stay where you are! Don't move!

Don't move! Stay where you are!

Eminence, what a pleasure to see you after all these years.

The pleasure is all mine, Mother Antonia.

The Holy Father?

He'll get out as soon as you hand over your phone.

Are you joking, Eminence?

I want a picture with the Pope.

We're not joking, and there won't be any picture with the Pope.

So what shall we do?

Do you think I went to all this trouble to not even get a picture with the Pope?

It's out of the question.

Mother, the Holy Father is waiting there in the car.

This isn't fair, and it's not equal treatment.

Is it plausible to expect equal treatment with the Pope?

I don't like the attitude of Pius XIII toward a woman like me who's given so much to the Church.

Mother, don't forget the law of reciprocity.

The Holy Father might dislike your attitude too.

Now try to make a small effort of peering into the future.

Who would have the worst of it in this contest?

I have influential philanthropist friends all over the world.

While the Pope doesn't even have one friend.

And yet it would take him just 20 minutes to shut down all 250 Villages of Goodness.

And believe me, I've come to know him very well.

If he wants to do it, he'll do it.

Now be a good girl and give me your phone.

And one more thing.

A little gift from the Pope.

Take one.

Wait. No. Better take two.

Let's go!

This is our church.

Next to it is the dormitory, the health care clinic, the dental clinic, the elementary school, the catechism school, the cafeteria, and the administrative offices.

Enough, enough.

Enough, enough.

Enough, enough.

Enough, enough.

Enough.

Enough, enough.

Enough.

Ni mara ngapi mimi aliiambia!

Huna kutumia maji, siyo nzuri kwa ajili ya afya!

Not all that glitters is gold.

That water is dangerous.

It can cause fluorosis, anemia, joint pains, dental disease, and kidney failure.

The main problem afflicting this area has to do with a supply of safe, clean drinking water.

Our benefactors send us huge quantities of clean water, but the bureaucracy, the soldiers, and the gangs hijack it illegally, and keep it for themselves.

This is a very ingenious system designed by a Dutch company, which donated it to us.

The water condenses on the glass and then drips into containers.

There are times when we manage to collect as much as three liters a day.

Would you like some water to drink, Your Holiness?

No thanks.

Forgive me, Father, for I have sinned.

I met this famous American author.

What a tempter!

He said he remembered only the perverse and lustful details of women.

Now I can't seem to do anything but remember my own very few details of that nature.

You might say to me: which ones?

When I met that girl in California on the beach, more than thirty years ago.

She told me:

You can touch my legs.

It's become an obsessive, very unhealthy thought.

Also, even though it was in good faith, I never even realized I was doing it, I must have sinned with Esther, Peter, and little Pius.

They left the Vatican, without saying goodbye to me.

Just vanished.

Now I can't seem to sleep at night, because I'm thinking about the photo that they left behind, a photo I thought mattered to them: a photo of me holding little Pius in my arms.

At times like this, I feel guilty, because I should be thinking about my only true friend: Andrew Dussolier... dead because of me, and yet I've already stopped feeling guilty about it.

This enormous burden swept away by... a tiny morsel of guilt.

How strange the human soul can be, isn't that true, Father?

Finally, Father, the world!

Pity, compassion... forgiveness... all this Christian virtues the world no longer attributes to me.

Can they be right?

Am I cruel?

All I know is everything I do, I do for the love of God.

And that's all.

My penitence, Father?

My penitence, Father?

Do you speak English?

You couldn't have told me before?

You've just letting me rattle on like an idiot for the past ten minutes!

Sister Antonia hides the water.

And she uses it to control the sick and the nuns.

In exchange for a few glasses of water she demands favors, obscene acts, and filth I could never repeat.

I beg you, please, Father, only you can help us.

Accipite et bibite ex eo omnes.

Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in mei memoriam facietis.

I have to tell you something, Holy Father.

Your Eminence, I don't wanna hear any more bad news.

You might not believe it, but for the first time I have a piece of good news to give you.

Let's hear it, then.

The simple fact that you have announced your first pastoral visit and the prospect of your first public appearance have resulted in a 12% increase in the number of requests to take part in your next mass at St. Peter's.

The morbid curiosity prompted by absence.

Your Eminence, as an orphan, I'm very familiar with this.

Holy Father, will you appear here, in Africa, for the first time?

You once asked me who I really am.

Do you remember that?

Certainly.

I'm just a man.

That's the answer.

That's not all.

Your Holiness, you are the Church.

How wonderful!

And to think that there are still people who believe that God doesn't exist.

What was that American journalist on the plane referring to?

Oh, probably just one of the many slanders making the rounds about the Holy Father.

Kurtwell and Belardo know each other because they both worked in New York, and that's all.

Oh I...

Forgive me.

No.

The civil war in this country, practically speaking, has never stopped.

It's hard to even come up with an estimate of the number of dead.

The arrival of the Holy Father has been particularly useful because it at least forced the sides to call a truce.

My fear is that, as soon as His Holiness leaves this land of ours, the warring bands will go back to slaughtering each other just like before.

Prince Abadi is a good man.

He's a great philanthropist, generous with us, and he does what he can to halt the violence, but without international aid the task is daunting.

I'd use my words with care, Mother Antonia.

The U.N. denounces Abadi as a ferocious torturer and old-school dictator, that's why there has been no international aid.

Your Eminence, I've been in this place for many years.

Prince Abadi is a good man.

The United Nations has been in this place for some time, too.

Prince Abadi is a good man.

The question here is: what exactly does it mean to be a good person?

Let's take you for instance Sister Antonia: are you a good person?

I believe I am.

Don't be in such a hurry.

Think carefully.

I try to live in accordance with Christian values.

Which ones?

You can use Christian values for all kinds of purposes.

A good person is somebody who puts himself last, who renounces his own temptations and needs, working only for the interests of others.

Now think carefully and answer sincerely, because I won't put up with even the tiniest lie from you: are you a good person?

There seems to be a some kind of misunderstanding concerning the meaning of my visit here to you.

You think I'm here to honor you.

In fact, I'm here to ascertain your temptations.

Heal yourself, Sister Antonia.

Halitosis is a deformation of the soul.

Water problem.

Ladies and gentlemen, His Holiness Pius XIII.

This is the vicar of Christ, Pope Pius XIII, speaking to you now.

Brothers and sisters, I want to be perfectly clear with you.

I have visited your country and I have seen dead bodies lying on the ground, hunger, blood, thirst, and poverty.

All these things are the offspring of the war and violence that has clutched your land for twelve years now.

I won't say the names of those who are guilty in this.

There are too many of them.

We are all guilty.

We are all guilty of war and death.

Always.

In the same way, we can all be guilty of peace.

Always.

I ask this of you on bended knee.

I am ready to die for you, if only you will become guilty of peace.

I always say to the children who write me from all over the world: think about all the things you like.

That is God.

Children like all sorts of things, but none of them has ever written that what they like is war.

Now look at whoever is next to you.

Look at them with eyes of joy and remember what St. Augustine said:

If you want to see God, you have the means to do it.

God is love.

I, on the other hand, won't speak to you about God until there is peace.

Because God is peace.

And peace is God.

Give me peace, and I'll give you God.

You don't know how wonderful peace is.

You have no idea how disconcerting peace can be.

But I know.

Because I saw it when I was eight years old on the banks of a river in Colorado... peace.

It was beautiful.

Yeah, I know.

Those dancers gave a wonderful performance.

No, Holy Father, I'm talking about your speech.

It was beautiful.

Holy Father, weather conditions in Rome are critical.

We're going to have to land in Naples.

I would never dare to contradict you.

Naples it is.

May I touch?

No!

I need to stop at the next gas station.

Certainly, Your Holiness.

O Lord... let us look each other right in the eyes, we can no longer put off this matter.

We now need to speak about Sister Antonia.

Blessed Virgin!

Maria... Maria...

Maria. Maria. Maria. Maria. Maria.

Lazio is going deep once again...

Watch out for Lulic!

How could we let this happen?

How could we let this happen? How could we let this happen?

Such a key game... wasted like this!

What the hell?!

What kind of Naples' team is this?

How can you possibly play such a crucial game this way?

We let them overtake us like this!

We let them overtake us like this!

For the second time!

How could we let this happen?

What a disappointment!

What a disappointment!

Lulic's 2-0...

Just as the first half was about to end.

What a disappointment!

What a disappointment!

Leave us!

They'll destroy us.

This losing retrograde battle against homosexuals, especially in the glare of that young man's suicide, will put an end to everything.

It's possible to tolerate a great many things but not a threat to one's own survival.

But you told me that you gave those photos to Sister Mary and that she had destroyed them.

That's true.

But first I made a copy... just in case.

What do you have in mind?

Let's give them to the press.

In fifteen days we'll have a new Pope.

An adult Pope.

Who?

Spencer.

Or else me.

No.

Me.

All right.

I'll pull strings in the Conclave like always, and you'll be the new Pope.

And you'll be an all-powerful Cardinal Secretary of State again.

But none of that will happen.

We won't use those photographs. There won't be any scandal.

Why not?

Because we can't show the world the image of a Pope with his hands on a young woman's breasts.

It would be the lowest point ever for the Church, that no subsequent Pope would ever be able to recover from it.

You're forgetting something.

subtitles: sookie sync &amp; corrections: othelo

I speak frequently with the Pope.

What I'm about to tell you he said to me in conversation, not in the confessional.

Which means I'm not breaking the seal of confession.

What are you about to tell me?

The Pope is going through a profound crisis of faith.

What are you insinuating, Don Tommaso?

That the Pope doesn't believe in God.

They've manifested themselves.

Who?

My Mom and Dad.

But how?

It came in a box. No postmark, no nothing.

Not a clue, no way to track them down.

Why don't they wanna be tracked down?

Because they're afraid of you, Your Holiness.

Everyone is afraid of you.

You've gotta cut it out with the fear, Your Holiness.

The important thing is that they're alive.

And they haven't forgotten you.

That's the Madonna of the jungle.

I know that.

Was there something you wanted to tell me, Sister Mary?

The Pope is upset, the Pope is experiencing a moment of weakness.

The Pope is distracted.

If you need to have him sign a document or something of the sort that gets our Church back on course, this would be the right time to do it.

I've done my part. Now you need to do yours.

What exactly have you done?

You'd better be ready, Voiello.

Someone might see us.

There is a new preface by Joseph.

I'm depressed, Angelo.

I don't give a sh1t that you're depressed, Michael.

At night, I take care of a disabled boy.

Last night I was looking at him, he was drooling and his eyes were blank, and I thought to myself: what is the Church doing for this boy?

And the answer was simple: the Church is doing nothing.

Why?

What was it doing before Pius XIII?

Are you depressed or suffering from amnesia, Michael?

Before Pius XIII the Church was taking care of the poor.

It was also taking care of the poor.

But there's a bigger question.

What is the Church doing on a more general basis?

It's not doing anything anymore.

It's killing time.

We have a Church that's just killing time and has become infinitely marginal.

That's exactly what the Pope wants: a marginal Church.

Small and dead.

He said it and now he's done it.

He wants to take the Church back to its beginnings?

In the beginning, all this was nothing more than Peter's tomb.

For what purpose?

To close himself off, to deny himself, to make himself inaccessible and mysterious?

Sacrifice and suffering to get closer to God.

In his convoluted logic this strategy is supposed to stimulate the world's curiosity and dedication, so that everyone will want to come back to discover the mystery.

Fine! But none of this is happening.

The churches are empty.

The mass with the Tridentine rite would discourage anyone.

It's now harder to become a priest than it is to become an astronaut.

The Pope is refusing to refinance the missions.

Our non-relations with other religions are tense and dangerous.

We've become few in number, alone, against the rest of the world.

St. Peter's Square is empty, dreary, and abandoned.

Michael, we have the duty to take steps.

How?

Michael, come see.

I know how to get him to resign, Michael.

And who would this new Pope be?

Forgive me, Lord, for I have deceived, I am deceiving, and I will continue to deceive the Holy Father.

Forgive me, Lord, but I can no longer continue to look on at the destruction of the man I love more than I love myself.

Forgive me, Lord, for I cannot continue any longer to look on at the destruction of the institution I love more than I love myself: the holy Roman Church.

Having fun, Aldo?

Yeah, I guess...

Don't you agree it's a crime that the cocktail culture is in decline, Your Eminence?

Is it really such a bad thing?

I should say so.

My father taught me the art of the cocktail when I was twenty-five.

My father was one of the first people in Italy to devote himself to the art of the cocktail, you know.

I'm sorry.

Can you excuse me just a moment?

You're a murderer.

Did you come for me?

No, no, I came because I've never felt so alone and in despair in all my life.

Angelo Sanchez is dead.

And I wanted to die when I first saw you.

I was dying of desire.

Ludovico, we'd like to go to bed.

Would you do us a favor?

Get his crucifix and take him back to the Vatican.

I'll take care of it, mom.

Who are you?

Ludovico Meraviglia.

When will they be here?

Soon.

They're clearing immigration and passport control.

Why don't you help the time pass by doing a little work?

They're here.

Show them in.

Did you send me a gift?

Yes.

What did you send me?

The piece of the pipe you were missing.

The piece I gave you before I left you.

How did you know I lost it?

From time to time I'd call the orphanage where you were growing up.

And they told me that you always kept a piece of the pipe with you, but that you were missing the other piece.

How did you find that piece?

I had already lost it after you left me at the orphanage.

Because one day, I was in a shop in Venice, and I happened to find the same pipe so I bought it.

And I sent you the piece of it that you had lost.

All right.

Now neither of you move.

It's not them.

Valente, expel these impostors from my home immediately.

Who are you, Lenny?

I'm an orphan.

Just like you.

When you gonna grow up?

Never.

A priest never grows up, because he can never become a father.

He'll always be a son.

That is why we imposed a vow of celibacy on ourselves thirteen centuries ago, because we must always be the sons of God, never dare try to take His place.

Do you know why I wanted to meet you up here?

No, why?

Because this is where that young Spaniard, Angelo Sanchez, jumped from.

He wanted to be a priest and we thwarted him.

I thwarted him.

And now he's dead.

Lucky him.

He's going to speak with God.

Unlike us, he's finally going to find out the way things stand.

What has become of your pity?

Have you never experienced pity?

I can't take it anymore, Lenny.

I wanna go home, I wanna go back to Honduras.

If you give up now, now that you're faced with the burden of responsibility and your own guilty conscience, when will you ever grow up?

When?

Who is betraying me?

Who is sending actors to my home, palming them off as my long-lost parents?

Who?

Voiello, Spencer?

Tell me, Tommaso.

No.

No, what?

No, I won't tell you anything else.

Why not?

Because I'm stupid, it's true, but not that stupid.

Do you resent me for not having made you a cardinal yet?

Yes, at first I thought that was the reason I wouldn't confide in you again.

You'll assume the purple at the next consistory.

It doesn't matter.

Because then I identified another reason I won't ever tell you anything again.

Why?

You don't believe in God, Holy Father.

You don't believe in God.

He pooped.

You can give him to me, Your Holiness.

I'm happy to change him.

Peter, get some rest, I'll take care.

Oh, a lot of poop!

Holy Father, the other day I was reflecting on the fact that the one thing on which we share a single view is the management of the Tonino Pettola case.

You can never be too careful.

Are you afraid of being poisoned, Your Holiness?

Among other things.

These are practices that have fallen out of use even in the Vatican, Your Holiness.

So... who organized that ridiculous masquerade with the fake parents?

Not me, Your Holiness.

I'd find it offensive if you thought I was behind that.

My methods are far more sophisticated.

I have to give you that.

Who, then?

I don't know. Believe me.

I wouldn't rule out the possibility that they were a couple of the kind of lunatics who crawl out of the woodwork, and that our screeners allowed themselves to be taken in.

Holy Father, I swear to God there is no conspiracy against you.

Only a great deal of sincere concern.

What did you have me sign the other day?

A simplified procedure for ordaining new priests.

And why did you have me sign it without talking to me about it first?

I had the documents delivered to you the night before.

I assumed you had read them.

No. That's not what happened.

You knew my head would be in the clouds and you had me hastily sign those documents that were completely opposed in their intent to the direction I' advocating..

No, that's not right.

I wanted you to sign the decree simplifying the procedure for ordaining new priests because the press is attacking us.

They're calling us murderers.

That with our shortsightedness, we killed young Angelo Sanchez.

What do you think?

Did we kill him?

Do you want the truth?

Yes, I want the truth.

No, Holy Father. We didn't kill him.

You killed him.

I couldn't bring myself to do it, Caltanissetta.

I couldn't have him sign his resignation.

It's time to speak the truth: Pius XIII is a total failure.

I'm gonna resign, Michael.

It's the only thing left to do.

He knows.

Do you know who I am?

Yes. You're Carlos Garcia.

And do you know what I do for a living?

I've heard that you're a narco.

No, I'm not just any narco.

I'm the biggest narco around.

And do you know how I became the biggest narco around?

By cunning?

No.

By violence.

I understand.

No, you don't understand.

Violence, per se, ought not to exist.

It does exist when there is a lack of respect.

But there are many different ways to disrespect.

And not all require the use of violence.

If you had preached in your church against the narcos and refused to give me communion, I wouldn't feel disrespected, you would simply have been doing your job, and I wouldn't have felt obliged to use violence against you.

But that's not what you did.

That's what the current bishop is doing, and he's right to do so.

In fact, no one would dream of laying a finger on him.

You however have chosen another path for your protests against drug trafficking.

You've decided to take my wife to bed.

And that's not right.

That's not right because now you're putting me in the odious position of having to decide whether to forgive you or not.

My profound religiosity tells me I should forgive you, but my professional working ethics tell me the opposite.

All right, Esteban, let's go.

Hello, Rome!

Greetings.

Thank you so much...

Thank you.

God has been evicted.

I'm going to hand in my resignation.

My papacy is a failure.

Never say that again, Lenny.

You will be a great Pope.

The most beloved Pope of them all.

You've healed the sick.

You've made a hopelessly sterile woman pregnant.

You are a saint.

A beautiful saint.

You are the sweet Christ come back to earth.

Thank you.

You're welcome.

Thank you for what you did for me the other day.

What did I do for you?

It was wonderful!

That was the loveliest moment of my life, to believe for a fleeting instant that I had found them again.

For just one moment, I felt like I'd come home.

What did he die of?

The same thing our Church is going to die of.

Old age.



...et apostolicae fidei cultoribus.

What is it about that statuette that you find so sensual?

I'd prefer not to delve into my psyche.

Holy Father, donations have declined.

Revenues from religious taxes, which our bishops and dioceses depend on for their survival, have declined, tourist visits to the Vatican have declined, greatly reducing the influx of funds to Vatican City.

There is not much that the Vatican Bank can do.

Our days of free willing finances are over.

Changes in banking regulations mean that our hands are now tied.

If we continue on this course, we'll be forced to start selling off our artistic patrimony simply to survive.

The faithful will return.

It's a natural cycle.

For now, the faithful are not returning.

And small but dangerous enclaves of Catholic fundamentalism are starting to spring up, just like in Islam.

Islam has more followers than the Catholic Church.

Don't you find it a burden to take on the responsibility of such risky and unpopular decisions?

No.

Your Holiness, who are you, really?

Therefore, by the authority of the almighty God of Saint Peter and Paul and by our Own, this venerable brother of ours, we create and solemnly proclaim of the Holy Roman Church, Cardinal Bernardo Alonso Gutierrez.

Receive the ring from the hands of Peter.

And know that through the love of the Prince of the Apostles your love for the Church is strengthened.

Push. Push more.

Push! Pushing, ok.

Ok, Esther.

Ok, Esther.

Push more.

Push. Very good, Very good.

Ok, Esther, ok, ok, ok.

Keep pushing, keep pushing now.

Ok.

Ok, ok.

Now let us offer the prayer that Christ has given us as the model of all prayers: Kyrie Elison.

Christe Elison.

Kyrie Elison.

Pater Noster, qui es in Caelis, sanctificetur Nomen Tuum.

Adveniat Regnum Tuum.

Fiat voluntas Tua, sicut in Caelo, et in Terra.

Panem nostrum quotidianum da nobis hodie, et dimitte nobis debita nostra, sicut et nos dimittimus debitoribus nostris.

Et ne nos inducas in tentationem, sed libera nos a malo.

Let us pray.

The Pope told me I would become a cardinal.

He didn't keep his promise.

I don't know...

This Pope...

I don't know... I don't know...

But I know so many things...

If I were to speak...

I don't know...

And now it's time for me to bid you all farewell.

I should have done it before, but the Holy Father kept me in Rome so I could begin work on my new responsibilities.

I beg your pardon for only coming back here after nine months to... to say goodbye and turn right around and head back to Rome.

But before I leave, I'd like to introduce you to the new bishop of San Pedro Sula, Monsignor Jorge Aguero.

I know Monsignor Aguero very well.

He's a hero.

From this pulpit he will shout at you to forsake evil, to fight against the gangs, to say no to death, to violence and the narcotrafficking that infests Honduras.

He will refuse to give communion to crime bosses and he will refuse to perform weddings for their daughters.

Yes, he will do all the things that I have failed to do.

Yes, because I'm not a hero.

Because...

I'm afraid.

Like you.

Perhaps that is why you have loved me, just a little. No?

Because I didn't make you uncomfortable.

I never asked you to choose.

I never blackmailed you by saying that in order to be good Christians you had to let yourselves be murdered by the henchmen of the drug cartels.

I loved you for the way you were... not for the way you ought to be.

Now I bid you farewell. I'm going to Rome.

But that's not going home for me.

I want you to know that, as far as I'm concerned, Honduras is and always will be ...my home.

Attention!

Flowers!

This is for the baby.

Oh, you shouldn't have, Holy Father.

It's a Bible that belonged to Thomas Jefferson, the President of the United States, but it's like new, he never opened it.

We certainly can't blame Jefferson, the Bible isn't light reading.

We named him Pius.

A name for a bird.

He'll fly high!

Do you want to hold him, Your Holiness?

That really would be an unusual experience for me.

And for Peter and I would be an honor.

Pleasure to make your acquaintance, Mr. Pius XIV.

It's a pity we can't remember what we smelled like when we were babies.

I do remember what my parents smelled like.

He takes after you.

But if you look closely, he also takes a little...

No. He's a very good-looking baby.

He resembles his mother.

Holy Father.

Forgive me. I'm such a fool.

My hands only know how to bless people.

It's all right, nothing happened.

I'm such an idiot.

We all have to get used to new things, Holy Father.

Nothing happened.

Yes, yes you're right, Peter.

Valente, was there something you wanted to tell me?

Holy Father, the Italian Prime Minister is waiting for you in the Vatican.

Of course, it slipped my mind.

Esther, I must go.

In my head, I'll be at this audience but in my heart I'll never have left this room.

It's surprising to see how a young woman, just moments after having a child, can be transformed into a mother.

Mr. Prime Minister, please allow me to recommend extreme caution with the Pope.

The information I've received suggests that he's more diabolical than saintly.

Excellent! He's finally meeting his match.

Eminence!

Welcome, Mr. Prime Minister, the Holy Father is expecting you.

Thanks.

This way please.

Good morning.

Good morning.

Good morning.

Good morning.

Good morning.

We'll be late for the audience!

Good morning.

Are you asleep, Holy Father?

No, Mr. Prime Minister. I'm praying for you, That's very thoughtful of you.

And thanks very much for giving me this audience, after just nine months.

I didn't think you'd be running the Country this long.

I said to myself: why bother?

But I was wrong.

Well, how is this Italy of ours doing?

Much better, thanks to me.

You think so?

Yes.

I think just the opposite.

If you wanted to do much better, perhaps you should keep firmly in mind this list of requests.

I jotted it down in a hurry just a few minutes ago.

If there's anything I've left off, I can certainly add it to the list.

I make sure you receive it promptly.

Greater assistance to Catholic families, no to common law marriages, no to gay marriages, more money to Catholic schools, further tax and banking benefits to the Holy See, absolute prohibition of abortion in all cases, absolute prohibition of divorce in all cases, no to any temptation to accept euthanasia, restrictions on the religious freedom of Muslims and Hindus, a reopening of discussions on the Lateran Pacts, a full review of the territorial boundaries of the Vatican State.

This last request really is remarkable, I have to admit.

I didn't know that you had expansionistic ambitions.

But I was told before coming that this new Pope is a very funny man.

But did they forget to inform you that this new Pope is a man who's far more intelligent than you?

No. Because it isn't true.

Do you know what the difference is between me and you, Holy Father?

Let's hear.

The difference is that I was elected with 41% of the votes.

That 41% exists.

You were elected by God.

And it's not a sure thing that God exists.

Fine!

There's another element worthy of your consideration: just in case God does happen to exist, do you know how long it would take Him to wipe that 41% off the face of the earth?

And where will God eradicate that 41%?

At the polls in the next election?

Or in their homes while they're watching TV?

Or perhaps in their sleep!

At the polls in the next election.

And what's more: I, as the vicar of Christ, will be happy to help God eradicating that 41%.

And if don't stop playing the idiot, I'm gonna be forced to prove to you that God does exists.

Let me explain something to you, Holy Father.

Please.

Your demands... might have some basis in fact at any other point in history.

At a point in history when the Church was stronger than it is right now, the Italian political equation would have been obliged to take your demands under serious consideration.

The way it always has in the past.

But now let us briefly analyze your Papacy, Holy Father.

In the past nine months you have never shown yourself to the faithful, you have not recited a single Angelus in St. Peter's Square, you have not communicated with anyone, you have simply retreated into your palace on the hill and you have threatened and terrorized the faithful, through your terse and telegraphic communiqus in L'Osservatore Vaticano, with obscurantist and retrograde theses.

The result has been that, according to a number of highly respected studies, Italian Catholics have turned away from the Church en masse.

This new development not only allows me to ignore your requests, but it gives me an even greater opportunity: finally to modernize Italy.

Without fear of retaliation or the risk of losing support among voters, I can review the colossal fraud of the eight per thousand Church tax, finally imposing punitive taxes on the dioceses, and, most important of all, I can finally free the country from the pork barrels, stumbling blocks, and vetoes of the Holy Roman Church in the areas of euthanasia, common law marriages, gay couples, abortion, scientific research.

To cut a long story short, Holy Father, thanks to you I can start a revolution.

A very persuasive speech.

I'm glad we're finally beginning to talk sense.

Persuasive and stupid, I might add, like every politicians' speech.

And what's more, unrealizable.

Unrealizable?

We shall see about that!


Now, if you'd care to listen to me, I'll show you that God exists, and how God and I can annihilate that 41% of the population that makes you feel so cheerful and full of yourself.

I am very eager to hear what you have to say, Holy Father.

I'm glad.

You see, Mr. Prime Minister, in the Sixties the young people that protested in the streets spouted all kind of heresies, all except one: power to the imagination.

In that, they were correct.

The only problem was they had no imagination.

And neither do you.

But God and I have plenty.

God and I are simply dripping with imagination.

Now, just try and imagine something with me: in six months, Italy will hold the general elections, and you will try to maintain or increase your 41% share of the electorate.

And right now everything indeed points to your ability to maintain that 41%.

Yeah.

But just imagine, a few weeks before the election, it comes an announcement.

Pope Pius XIII has decided to appear in public for the very first time.

To talk to the Italian Catholics.

What morbid curiosity!

The whole world is dying of curiosity.

And it is absolutely to be expected, it's normal, we all want to see that which is hidden, we all want to stare the forbidden in the face.

Pius XIII appears and so do his beautiful blue-eyes... and this soft, round mouth.

A dazzling image, so dazzling it blinds people.

In other words, a powerful, an evocative image, not unlike that of Christ.

But Pius XIII doesn't merely dazzle, he offers reassurance as well.

With a magnificent speech, full of quotations in Latin, it tells them that they, the faithful, must not be afraid.

And how could they be afraid, with a Pope as handsome and reassuring as Christ?

Last of all, just a few short weeks before the elections, the Pope says just two words:

non expedit.

Do you know what that means?

No.

No, of course you don't. You're far too young.

The non expedit was first issued by Pius IX in 1868.

It was eliminated by Benedict XV in 1919, but guess what I can do?

What I, who am not answerable to 41% of the Italians, but only to God who, by the way, does not express His displeasure on social networks if I make a mistake.

Guess what I can do?

I can restore the non expedit.

The Catholics will all rush to Google those words.

What do they mean?

The non expedit means that the Holy Father decrees it is unacceptable for Catholics to vote in the Italian elections.

And do you know what the surveys that you have commissioned tell us?

They tell us that the number of Italians who identify themselves as Catholics are 87.8% of the population.

Now you may say to me: they could simply disobey you.

True.

But while a Catholic might disobey the Pope, they'd never disobey Christ.

I'm already the former, but believe me, if I want to, I can have myself accredited as the latter as well, and when I do, you'll lose your election.

Here's how it works: since you get 31% of your votes from the Catholic electorate, ah, you'd wind up with a mere 10%.

I wouldn't be so sure of those numbers, if I were you.

Mr. Prime Minister, take a look in this mirror.

What do you see?

Two young men.

One of whom is dressed in a slightly odd style.

I, on the other hand, see two media events.

One has already taken place, that's you.

The other is about to happen.

Now, having set out... to prove to you the existence of God, I believe I'm done.

But in that case, why... why haven't you appeared in public yet?

Because there's still no need.

You weren't all that wrong: this Pope is diabolical.

Good morning.

This Pope is a saint.

I can say that much after my meeting with the Holy Father.

A warm, productive and stimulating meeting.

Nonetheless, substantial disagreements remain with the Holy See.

The Italian government, despite the Pontiff's misgivings, will continue the efforts to legalize common law marriages, no matter what the sexual orientation is.

And, as you know, the revision of the eight per thousand Church tax is approaching and will be the subject of our next cabinet meeting.

Holy Father, would you like me to see what I can do to mend the relations with the Italian Government?

He's bluffing.

Who?

The young man in a hurry who's speaking on TV right now.

He's selling smoke and mirrors.

He won't do a thing he says.

Holy Father, I've read the draft bills that have already been approved by the various commissions.

These people are deadly serious.

The revision of the eight per thousand Church tax would threaten the survival of the Italian bishops.

Would that be such a bad thing?

What do we care? You and I are the Holy See.

The Italian bishops can take care of themselves.

Holy Father, I beg you, this is no laughing matter.

Rest easy, he's bluffing.

Holy Father, believe me, political awareness is an archetypal emotion for the Secretary of State.

Soccer mania is an archetypal emotion for the Secretary of State.

I want to let you know that I've been working hard on something new.

On what?

A measure forbidding priests from giving absolution in the confessional to women who have had abortions.

Its a kind of soft, disguised form of excommunication.

Holy Father, we will wake up and find the women of the world, led by the Femen, rushing the walls of the Vatican, hammers in hand, bent on destruction.

Fine. We'll rebuild those walls, taller and finer.

Old and unreliable Rorschach tests orders to investigate intrusively into the past of aspiring priests, young men paid bounties to lure those aspiring priests into compromising sexual situations as soon as they're allowed out into the world.

That's what I read in the directive I found on my desk this morning, drawn up by who knows what renegade underling while I was in Honduras.

Drawn up by me!

Every candidate for priesthood takes a vow of chastity.

Their sexual predilections are irrelevant.

Every candidate for priesthood takes a vow of chastity and none of them respect them.

That's the truth.

Well, I'm telling you no.

Lenny, I'm not okay with this.

I didn't go looking for my parents.

Instead, I went back to the orphanage, in order to be with my friend Andrew Dussolier, who was all I had left in the world.

That was the beginning.

You owe me, as a friend, as a man of the cloth who acknowledges my authority, you must do what I ask.

Here you are: Sanchez Angelo.

My superiors have determined that you are neither suited for nor worthy of the priesthood.

You are prohibited from requesting admission to a seminary, in your home diocese or in any other, for seven years.

Why?

Put in simpler terms, the sexual disturbances afflicting you are unacceptable in terms of our standards.

What do you want?

Your resignation.

Otherwise... our order will threaten a schism.

A schism?

Just try it.

I'll strip you of all you have.

Everything.

Your beds, your tunics, your underpants, all those wonderful monasteries you have in the most wonderful, loveliest places on earth.

Because all that belongs to me.

Are you ready to live on the street? Like St. Francis of Assisi?

Are you ready to sleep on the ground, kicked and spat upon by junkies, and homeless people, and drunks?

I'm ready to wage a war without end against you.

Are you ready to wage that war, armed with nothing but bottomless poverty?

I didn't think so.

And in that case, stop talking bullshit and get yourselves some shoes, because the air in here is unbreathable.

Angelo Voiello?

Jesus.

Who sent you? Pius XIII?

No, Raffaele Esposito, the magistrate.

Captain Becchi is here and he would like to ask you a few questions.

And I'll be happy to provide him with some answers.

This is for you.

Read it!



What do you recommend?

Father Antonello did a great job with A Great Little Soul, So did Liliana with A Man...

I'll take 1001 Illustrious Names Blackmailed by Angelo Voiello.

There, only there.



May I have some cane sugar?

We don't have any cane sugar, Captain.

Eminence, do you have any idea why I'm here?

The owner of the Er Core de Roma restaurant... must have filed a complaint against me.

Last week he claimed that Maradona is still on drugs, and I really lashed out at him.

I said: You ugly sh1t, don't you dare take the Lord's name in vain again.

No, Your Eminence, we're here about Tonino Pettola. Do you know him?

Who?

Tonino Pettola.

Ah, yes. Of course, I know his reputation, a lousy reputation, let me add.

He's a notorious con artist who claims he can pick out the Blessed Virgin Mary amid his flock of sheep.

The Congregation for the Causes of Saints has repeatedly and vehemently rejected his applications.

Have you ever met him personally?

Never.

Pettola's relatives claim the exact opposite.

They say that Tonino Pettola, one evening a few months ago, in his home met with you, the Pope and other Cardinals.

From that moment on he seemed shocked and obsessed with your meeting because they say that you threatened to throw him in quicksand.

Does it strike you as plausible, Captain, that the Cardinals, the Secretary of State and the Pope would all go to Tonino Pettola's house and threaten to throw him in quicksand?

It does seem strange but not implausible.

Why? What happened to Tonino Pettola?

He disappeared.

His relatives claim he was being persecuted by persons high up in the Vatican.

Do you really think we'd waste our time on a poor raving lunatic?

That poor man had followers all around the world and was about to found his own Church.

He's not the only one, Captain.

At least two crazies pop up every day.

If the Vatican were to persecute and threaten them all, it wouldn't have time to do anything else.

Phone records reveal that numerous calls from inside the Vatican were made to Pettola.

I believe it.

People are always making calls from the Vatican.

I've been fighting for years against such wasteful behavior.

Waste is not the point, Your Eminence.

Don't you think it's a contradiction?

If Pettola was an insignificant artist and you had no interest in him, why all the phone calls?

The Congregation for the Causes of Saints was in contact with him, doing their best to check his urgent demands.

The calls not only came from the Congregation for the Causes of Saints but also from Your Eminence's offices and from the Pope's.

In the Secretary of State and the Pope's offices there are about 250 employees.

I can't rule out that someone might have had a reason to call Tonino Pettola.

Perhaps someone that believed all his fibs and wanted to meet him.

Do you have any idea where Tonino Pettola might be?

He's probably in some far-flung monastery praying and repenting.

You have an answer for everything, Eminence.

That's my job, Captain.

I've heard the same thing.

What, Captain?

That Maradona is still doing drugs. A friend of mine told me, he's in Intelligence and stationed in Dubai.

Why do you want to hurt me, Captain? Why?

Because I'm a fan of Inter, Your Eminence.

Cardinal Dussolier.

I know you, but you don't know me.

I'm Contessa Emma Meraviglia, the wife of General Meraviglia.

Good evening.

You know, I don't like seeing you all on your own.

I'm accustomed to it, signora.

That's a bad custom to get into.

My girlfriends would compete to keep you company.

And so would I.

In any case, my husband and I will be hosting a party Thursday at our villa.

If you're at loose ends, please come.

It would be an honor for my husband and me.

Ok, thank you. I'll keep it in mind.

Bye.

My name is Angelo Sanchez.

I was born in Alicante into a family of manual laborers and I am not a homosexual.

I had such a simple dream: to serve God.

You murdered my dream.

You are nothing more than a pathetic, miserable, cowardly murderer.

I could have been an excellent priest.

Yeah, you could have.

I want to go home.

What do you mean, home?

We're both orphans.

You too?

Me too.

I was abandoned by my parents when I was just three years old.

Children are so lovely when they are three years of age.

How can anyone abandon a three year old?

Where do you find the nerve?

I never knew you were an orphan, too.

Well... now you know.

Does Lenny know?

No.

And he never will.

Why not?

Because you don't steal the stage from the Pope.

And you don't interfere with his sorrow.


Where is he now?

He's angry.

But not with you, or for that matter with me.

His anger keeps Him from viewing matters objectively.

And so, in protest, he's moved to a new place, he's gone to the outskirts of town, a filthy studio apartment upstairs from a tire repair shop.

At night, God suffers from the heat.

He can't seem to sleep, because He's come to the conclusion that there's nothing He can do about human beings.

He's decided that He's lost the u.

Now it's up to you.

The attentions that Your Holiness has been paying to the wife of the commandant of the Swiss Guard have not gone unnoticed.

According to vox populi, it is believed that the Holy Father is conducting an unseemly relationship with that woman.

Monsignor Gutierrez was right: in the Vatican, gossip is called calumny.

Your Holiness, what do you intend to do?

Revolution, Tommaso.

I intend to start a revolution.

People say you're a saint.

People say you're a saint who performs miracles.

Hail Mary, full of grace.

Our Lord is with Thee.

Blessed art Thou among women, and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.

Holy Mary, Mother of God, pray for us sinners, now and at the hour of our death.

Amen.

Bingo!

Now, Holy Father, I no longer really know what miracle to wish for.

I no longer really know what miracle to wish for.

Esther, I love God because it is so painful to love human beings.

I love a God that never leaves or that always leaves me.

God, the absence of God...

Always reassuring and definitive.

I am a priest, I have renounced my fellow man, my fellow women, because I don't want to suffer, because I'm incapable of withstanding the heartbreak of love, because I'm unhappy, like all priests.

It would be wonderful to love you the way you want to be loved, but it's not possible.

Because I am not a man.

I am a coward.

I am a coward.

Like all priests.

That's enough photos for now.

Watch out for the custodian.

Are you up for going on?

I am. What about you?

Sister Mary will be upset.

I don't care.

I wanna find my mom and dad.

I'm going back. I'm sorry, Lenny.

Ok.

You couldn't get to sleep!

The evening doesn't console me.

Nothing's changed, as you can see.

Well, something's changed.

You were just a jerk, now you've become the Pope.

Let's smoke a cigarette together, secretly.

Like when we were kids.

I'm glad that you find a moment to say hello to me.

How could you doubt that I'd come?

I always doubt.

When are you gonna make this blessed speech to the cardinals?

When I have something to say.

Well, I'm all out of cigarettes.

The Holy Father isn't in the Apostolic Palace.

Nor is the Cardinal Secretary of State.

What time is it?

Three in the morning.

I'll take care of it. You go to sleep.

And don't say a word to anyone.

Will you let me in?

Of course.

Thank you.

You are very beautiful at night, Sister Mary.

Please...

Let me introduce you to my best friend, Girolamo.

Is he a good friend?

Yes.

The only one who never criticizes me.

Why did you come here?

Because of the Pope.

How disappointing! I thought you came because of me.

Nobody knows where the Pope is.

Oh, don't worry.

Sooner or later all popes need to remind themselves what freedom is.

Then they come back.

We had to go to retrieve Pius XIII's predecessor from a bingo parlor.

He was arguing with the caller, saying he was cheating.

When you want, you know how to be quite comforting.

How beautiful you are, Sister Mary, at night.

You already told me that.

We love God because it is so painful to love other men and women.

You and I have renounced our fellow men, and women, because we don't want to suffer, because we're incapable of withstanding the heartbreak of love.

Because we're unhappy.

Because we're cowards.

Like all priests and all nuns.

Your words are beautiful.

But that's not all.

They're true.

They are not my words, they're the words of your Pope.

Yes, yes, Girolamo, now I'll tell Sister Mary.

What are you going to tell me?

That I had found a way of destroying the Holy Father.

I'd collected all the evidence for a good old-fashioned scandal.

But I'm not going to do it.

The evidence is in here.

Here, you take it.

Your hands are safer than mine.

Because, you know something, Sister Mary?

You were right, your Pope really is a saint.

Yes.

He is!

Good evening, Sir.

Hi.

Would you sell us some cigarettes?

I don't know if we have any.

Make yourselves comfortable. I'll go check.

Thank you.

Andrew!

Please, take a sit.

English?

Americans.

You look like a couple of priests.

We are not priests.

Have you ever seen two priests wearing track suits?

I've seen everything.

By the way, did you know I have clients who insist I am proof of the existence of God?

Interesting theory!

But they are wrong.

They see me because they can't see far.

Can you see far?

Yes.

And I have proof of the existence of God.

Show me.

Ma'am, show me, I implore you.

Your eyes...

Your eyes, sir.

They are proof of the existence of God.

We should go.

Goodnight, ma'am.

Do you remember the time... Sister Mary took us to the custodian's house?

Billy's mother, on her deathbed?

Yeah, I remember. I don't wanna talk about it.

It's pointless for you to go on pretending nothing happened, Lenny.

Something extraordinary happened in that room.

I don't feel like talking about it.

You're my best friend and I don't understand you.

Why don't you wanna talk about it?

I only want to talk about things that I understand.

Don't you get that?

So, what if I asked you to become Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy?

Select the candidates for the priesthood from all over the world.

Would you do it?

And what if I were to refuse?

Then I'd be forced to make recourse to my sovereign power.

I am the Pope, now.

I wanna tell you something.

It's something I've never told you before.

So tell me now.

When you first came to the orphanage, I was watching... from a window, and...

I don't remember your father, but I remember your mother.

What did she look like?

Her hair was parted in the middle and long on the sides... and her eyes... were bright... and... impassive, which made me think she was sad.

That's exactly how I dream of her.

Always.

Why didn't you ever tell me?

When we were boys, I thought, I thought it would cause you too much pain.

It causes me too much pain even now.

Did you want to run away?

Come on, let's go back inside.

I haven't said anything to the Cardinal Secretary of State.

Thank you so much, Sister Mary.

Monsignor, I forgive you for having betrayed our confidences to the Cardinal Secretary of State.

Your Holiness, how did you find out?

I forgive you for being an alcoholic and I recommend you stop drinking now that you're about to set off on a challenging mission to America.

Your Holiness, what else do you know about me?

I know everything a powerful man needs to know about the people he works with.

And I, not Voiello, am the most powerful man of all.

And what else do you know about me, Holy Father?

What else is there to know?

You always talk to me about my holiness, the miracle I've supposedly performed, but you never tell me anything about the only miracle I need, the miracle that doesn't happened and never will: seeing my parents again.

You must have faith in God, Your Holiness, and you'll see them again.

I'm getting old.

Time is turning into a thin sheet, and seeing them dead is of no interest to me.

I'm only interested in the living.

Holy Father, I beg you to reconsider your decision to send to America Monsignor Gutierrez.

The Kurtwell case needs to be examined by a person of substantial reputation.

Gutierrez is not up to it.

He has none of the necessary expertise, and moreover he's fragile and emotional, and the Holy See will send the world the message that it does not take seriously the problem of child abuse or, even worse, is not interested in it.

And there is another problem.

I didn't want to tell you, but now I'm forced to: Your Holiness, Gutierrez is an alcoholic.

I know.

And there is also another secret.

What if I knew that one too?

What if I knew all your secrets, Your Eminence?

What were you hoping to achieve?

Start a scandal?

The idea of threatening that poor girl, who suffers from sterility!

Will you stop at nothing, Your Eminence?

Don't you know the meaning of the word pity?

How far were you willing to go?

Would you have blackmailed the Holy Father?

Would you have gone so far as to give those pictures to the press, to insinuate a nonexistent sexual relationship between me and that young woman?

You haven't figured out that your old methods only work on the old popes, who were afraid of losing consensus.

They don't work with me.

I am the young pope.

I put no stock in consensus.

Who told...

Who told you all these things?

You put on airs as a politician, you still haven't figured out you've run up against a politician far cannier than you.

Me.

Holy Father, I've already destroyed those pictures.

It's true, I was thinking of using old, violent methods, but I repented in time, Holy Father.

I repented before I could sin.

The wonderful words that you said to that young woman illuminated me.

I implore you, forgive me. I need your forgiveness.

You don't need my forgiveness. You need my compassion.

Now stop making a spectacle of yourself and get off.

Holy Father, the papal tiara has arrived from Washington, it's in perfect condition.

Prepare the Sistine Chapel.

The time has come to address the cardinals.

No.

They're still there.

I'm going to turn around, and they'll still be there.

I'm going to turn around now, and I'll see them: mom and dad waiting for me.

Knock knock!

Knock knock!

We're not in.

Brother cardinals, from this day forward, we're not in, no matter who's knocking on our door.

We're in, but only for God.

From this day forward, everything that was wide open is gonna be closed.

Evangelization.

We've already done it.

Ecumenicalism.

Been there, done that.

Tolerance.

Doesn't live here anymore.

It's been evicted.

It vacated the house for the new tenant, who has diametrically opposite tastes in decorating.

We've been reaching out to others for years now.

It's time to stop!

We are not going anywhere.

We are here. Because, what are we?

We are cement.

And cement doesn't move. We are cement without windows.

So, we don't look to the outside world.

Only the Church possesses the charisma of truth, said St. Ignatius of Antioch.

And he was right.

We have no reason to look out.

Instead, look over there.

What do you see?

That's the door.

The only way in.

Small and extremely uncomfortable.

And anyone who wants to know us has to find out how to get through that door.

Brother cardinals, we need to go back to being prohibited.

Inaccessible and mysterious.

That's the only way we can once again become desirable.

That is the only way great loves stories are born.

And I don't want any more part-time believers.

I want great love stories.

I want fanatics for God. Because fanaticism is love.

Everything else is strictly a surrogate, and it stays outside the church.

With the attitudes of the last Papacy, the church won for itself great expressions of fondness from the masses. It became popular.

Isn't that wonderful, you might be thinking!

We received plenty of esteem and lots of friendship.

I have no idea what to do with the friendship of the whole wide world.

What I want is absolute love and total devotion to God.

Could that mean a Church only for the few?

That's a hypothesis, and a hypothesis isn't the same as reality.

But even this hypothesis isn't so scandalous.

I say: better to have a few that are reliable than to have a great many that are distractible and indifferent.

The public squares have been jam-packed, but the hearts have been emptied of God.

You can't measure love with numbers, you can only measure it in terms of intensity.

In terms of blind loyalty to the imperative.

Fix that word firmly in your souls: Imperative.

From this day forth, that's what the Pope wants, that's what the Church wants, that's what God wants.

And so the liturgy will no longer be a social engagement, it will become hard work.

And sin will no longer be forgiven at will.

I don't expect any applause from you.

There will be no expressions of thanks in this chapel.

None from me and none from you.

Courtesy and good manners are not the business of men of God.

What I do expect... is that you will do what I have told you to do.

There is nothing outside your obedience to Pius XIII.

Nothing except Hell.

A Hell you may know nothing about... but I do.

Because I've built it, right behind that door: Hell.

These past few days, I've had to build Hell for you, that's why I've come to you belatedly.

I know you will obey, because you've already figured out that this pope isn't afraid to lose the faithful if they're been even slightly unfaithful, and that means this Pope does not negotiate.

On anything or with anyone.

And this Pope cannot be blackmailed!

From this day forth, the word compromise, has been banished from the vocabulary.

I've just deleted it.

When Jesus willingly mounted the cross, he was not making compromises.

And neither am I.

Amen.

Jump.

Holy Father, I have to confess a horrible thing I did.

Confess your secrets to God alone, Esther.

Even those that have to do with me.

There's only one thing I can do for you: forgive you.

Forgive you always.

Holy Father...

I feel it.

Yes.

I feel it.

Yes.

You're right. I feel it too.

Bye, Zizi', thanks!

Gentlemen... what an honor!

To what do I owe... the reason... for this visit?

Tonino Pettola, the reason for this visit... is that you... have busted our balls!


Here among us is Tonino Pettola, the Great!

The stigmata!

The stigmata!

You... it's you...

It's really you!

You all see a sheep, but it's not a sheep!

This is the Madonna!

I see Mary!

Wicked! Sick! Sinners! Pray!

Pray to the Virgin Mary!

Mother, Mother!

The wicked long to be freed of their wickedness!

The sick of their sickness! The sinners of their sinfulness!

I'm speaking to You. I'm speaking to You, Mother.

Hear the prayers of your faithful ones and get to work.

I'm asking You...

I, the Messiah!

The poor Tonino!

Give us strength!

Enough!

Corpus Domini nostri Jesu Christi custodiat animam tuam in vitam aeternam, amen.

Why were you crying?

My sister is dying.

Where is your sister?

At home, in Sri Lanka.

What's wrong with her?

She's dying.

Have you gone to see her?

I don't have the courage.

Why did you become a nun?

I met the Lord.

Where?

In a bar.

I was poor.

A drunk German came up to me and said, God helps the poor.

Are you strong?

I do my best. But I'm little.

You must be strong, for your sister.

I shall be.

And pray till you can't pray any more.

I always do.

And if your sister were to die, would you go to Sri Lanka for the funeral?

No.

Why not?

Because when I go home, I'm overcome with such terrible memories that I end up doubting whether God exists.

And I don't want to doubt whether God exists.

You're not the only one who doubts.

Excuse me?

I said I understand.

All right, that's enough.

Why does sin bring more sin?

When will you halt my treacherous and vindictive hand, Lord Jesus?

Or is it You... who is gently moving my hand for the sake of the church?

I beg you, don't let me die with this anguish, Lord.

Eminence.

She's here.

Would Young Esther like an espresso?

Are you sure?

I even arranged to buy some cane sugar.

I know that you young people go crazy over cane sugar.

Let's come to the point, Estherina.

First of all, you should stay calm and rest assured that we only want what's best for you.

We are your friends.

Now, I've come upon this report, of which only the people in this room are aware, I'm pleased to tell you, that you had an extramarital relationship with Valente, the Pope's assistant.

You understand without being told that this is an awkward matter.

Because of the rank of the people involved.

Because of the fear of gossip.

Because of how badly this might disappoint the Pope.

Because of the terrible repercussions that might ensue if news of this matter were to get out.

Shouting, dramatic scenes, transfers, firings.

And of course it's especially embarrassing in moral terms: Catholics united in holy matrimony swear to be faithful to their spouses.

You have sinned, Esther.

We know and we understand that this was a moment of weakness.

It happens.

As a boy, whenever Napoli, my favourite soccer team, was in serious trouble, don't you think I found myself being a little sympathetic toward Avellino?

Yes, I did.

In your sin we don't detect the marks of unbridled lust, but the fact remains that the act you committed was gravely wrong.

Very gravely wrong.

Fine. Now I'm ready to guarantee that not a word of that disagreeable episode will ever leave this room.

And what do you guarantee me in return?

Don't worry.

It's me...

Voiello.

Why does sin bring sorrow?

Why does sin bring starvation?

Why does sin bring arrogance?

Why does sin bring coercion?

You remind me of my first and only girlfriend, Esther.

Only you're much prettier.

One should never be ashamed nor proud of one's beauty.

Because God asks us to rejoice in it.

Do you rejoice in your beauty?

I'll bet that you don't let your husband do it either.

I think that's a mistake.

The punishment of God is never over beauty. Never.

Now tell me what your problem is.

Then I'll do it for you.

Esther is a fervent Roman Catholic woman, who is happily married to Peter and childless.

She enjoys spending her mornings roller skating with the children of the other Swiss Guards.

But it's not roller skating that Esther loves.

She loves what she cannot have.

You ask me what my problem is, but you already know because you are so profound.

I'm not profound, I'm presumptuous.

What matters is that you talk about your problem.

Yes, Holy Father, I'm sterile.

And Peter is sterile, too.

I'd like to listen to a child's voice.

Pray to Mary, our Mother of miracles, who intercedes for us.

She knows what to do.

Pray to Mary, our Mother of miracles, who intercedes for us.

She knows what to do.

You're a phenomenal lip-reader, Amatucci. Just phenomenal.

My sister is dead, Holy Father.

Let us pray for her.

I'd like to go to Sri Lanka for her funeral.

Don't go chasing the dead, Suree, or else the dead will chase after you.

Elena.

She takes after you.

Vis baptizare...

Elena.

Elena, ego te baptizo in nomine Patris, et Filii, et Spiritus Sancti.

Allegra.

She takes after you.

Ego te baptizo in nomine Patris, et Filii, et Spiritus Sancti.

Aida.

She takes after you.

Yes, it's perfectly clear she is been adopted, but this doesn't change the things.

She still takes after you.

Carolus.

Holy Father, I beg your pardon, I really had no idea I was in the men's bathroom.

Actually, this is neither the men's bathroom nor the women's.

This is the Pope's bathroom.

I'm so sorry.

Do you mind if I finish applying my lipstick?

Even if I did mind, a woman like yourself would find a way to go on applying it anyway.

So please, go right ahead.

You know women, Holy Father!

That's a reckless statement, signora.

Come take a look.

He's Lorenzo Insigne.

Insigne.

Who is that man who has caught the interest of half the Curia?

The personal assistant to the Prime Minister of Greenland.

Is he gay?

Openly so.

And that woman is the Prime Minister?

Hamsik, with the mohawk.

That's right.

And she has an audience with you, Holy Father.

Doesn't that strike you as odd?

What, Your Holiness?

After all, wouldn't etiquette require that we entertain the Prime Minister, not her assistant?

The Cardinal Secretary of State is entertaining her.

What about the fact that such a sizable group of men have eyes only for a handsome man, and pay no attention to such stunning feminine beauty?

Holy Father, I know exactly how to answer that question.

How?

With the silence.

Why?

Because you should never stick your nose into other people's business.

Especially not in the Vatican.

The Prime Minister of Greenland is waiting for you.

I know.

I'm incredibly handsome, but please, let's try to forget about that.

What have you brought for me?

The best our Country has to offer, Holy Father.

This is the largest halibut caught in all of Greenland last week.

This is very good poached in a light broth, just like pezzogna.

Pezzogna?

Sea bass.

And this is a beautiful song by an Italian singer who is pretty popular in our country.

She is called Nada and the song is entitled Senza un perch.

Thank you.

This is from me, for you.

Thank you, Holy Father. It's wonderful.

Holy Father, first of all, I bring you the greetings of the Catholic community of Nuuk, in Greenland.

Yes, I know all about Nuuk.

It's a small Catholic community that you have, in Greenland.

Am I right?

Yes, you are.

The predominant Faith in Greenland is Evangelical Lutheran.

And you have a female bishop, if I'm not wrong.

Exactly. Sofia Petersen, an estimable woman.

All bishops are estimable.

Did you know that Pope Pasquale II appointed the first bishop to Greenland?

A place that, as you know very well, is technically part of North America, four full centuries before Christopher Columbus?

I do know that, Holy Father.

The Catholic Church was the first to arrive in Greenland.

But it's not always the case that the first to arrive remains first.

I agree, Holy Father.

In Greenland, we Catholics are like the native Americans.

We got there first and then we were confined to reservations.

I agree, Holy Father.

You are a woman who tends to agree.

Oh, don't worry, Madame Prime Minister.

I'm not asking you for anything for our small community in Greenland.

I just wanted to remind you that we Catholics were there first.

Everyone else is a guest.

I don't want you to forget that.

I won't, Holy Father.

Very good!

Now, I ask you, please satisfy my morbid curiosity: since your country never thaws, I have to wonder, what's under all that ice?

The experts believe that Greenland is not an island, but an archipelago of islands.

But that's strictly a matter of supposition.

As you say: the country never thaws and no one can see what's under there.

I think the experts are wrong.

Really, Holy Father?

Yes.

Under all that ice could be God.

...gratia plena, Dominus tecum, benedicta Tu in mulieribus, et benedictus fructus ventris Tui, Jesus.

Sancta Maria, Mater Dei, ora pro nobis peccatoribus, nunc et in hora mortis nostrae.

Amen.

Ave Maria, gratia plena, Dominus tecum, benedicta Tu in mulieribus, et benedictus fructus ventris Tui, Jesus.

Sancta Maria, Mater Dei, ora pro nobis peccatoribus, nunc et in hora mortis nostrae.

Amen.

Holy Father...

Would you teach me to pray?

Start praying aloud.

Let me see how you do it.

Blessed Virgin Mary, give me the grace of becoming pregnant.

Prayer shouldn't be a list of requests, Esther.

It should be an occasion for understanding.

While we pray, we reflect... in the most elevated way we can, so that someone can whisper thoughts into our ears.

We call that someone God.

Or, in the present case, the Madonna of Lourdes.

All right. Then let me try again.

Blessed Virgin Mary, God does not punish beauty, as a person who is very dear to You once told me.

That phrase opened my eyes.

And it made me understand that perhaps, by making a gift of beauty, I might perhaps receive some in return.

And what if making a gift of my beauty meant receiving the beauty that I so desire?

The beauty of a new life, of a little child?

Yes, now you're praying.

What if it was an intolerable burden to me to donate my beauty to the person I promised to love in sickness and in health?

What if I wanted to donate my beauty somewhere else?

If you were to give your beauty elsewhere, you would not receive the beauty of a new life, but only sorrow... and the unbearable burden of guilt.

You know, Esther, Spinoza set us the most daunting challenge of them all.

He said: He that loves God does not demand that God should love us in return.

I don't understand.

I know.

But in time you will.

Holy Father, the truth is I know to whom I'd like to donate my beauty.

I'd like...

Now, Esther, continue to pray in your head.

There are certain secrets you must share only with God.

Stop crying, Suree!

That's enough!

Believers don't cry!

That's not right!

It's time we stop crying at funerals.

You don't believe.

Suree, you don't believe.

Holy Father, I brought you a gift to improve our relationship a little.

Thanks.

These are supposed to be worse than real cigarettes.

I was told that they're good for you.

It doesn't matter.

It's a substitute for the real thing.

What I want, always, is the whole truth.

Then you've come to the wrong place.

Holy Father, don't call me repetitive, but when is your speech to the cardinals going to take place?

In due time.

Yes, but when?

You really don't understand, do you?

What am I supposed to understand?

That I'm creating.

What are you creating?

Anticipation.

Holy Father, shall we look into the Kurtwell case a little?

Your Eminence, the answer is yes.

I want to look into the Kurtwell case, but from a broader point of view.

The individual case is always an indicator of a larger issue.

I agree. Let's pursue all the cases of pedophilia that are infesting our Church.

Let's widen the circle.

Let's prosecute all the cases of homosexuality that are infesting our Church.

Let's root out all the homosexuals and expel them, and prevent any new gay priests from entering our Church.

Let's do it for real, without exceptions and without hypocrisy.

Holy Father, pedophilia and homosexuality are two very different things.

Two very different things that are both equally unacceptable to the Catholic Church.

It would be a war that would leave the ground littered with corpses.

Do you want to know how many corpses would litter the ground?

Two thirds of the Clergy.

Then what becomes of Mother Church's capacity for forgiveness?

Our abuse of forgiveness we've become a laughingstock.

As unreliable as some miserable little third-world country.

With your methods, on the other hand, we're likely to become as reliable as, say, North Korea.

No.

And do you wanna know what the difference is?

We don't imprison ours, we set them free.

We pardon every one of them, but one second later we kick them out the door.

All right, Holy Father, as you command.

I have a question for you.

Holy Father, I have a great many shortcomings, but there can be no doubt about my heterosexuality.

Even if I can't bring you any direct testimony on the matter.

That wasn't the question.

Oh, sorry.

What was the question?

Would you tell me about your calling?

Holy Father, I'll tell you the truth.

If you expect me to tell you a tale of blinding illuminations or dazzling conversions, you're going to be disappointed.

Quite simply, I had a predisposition.

A predisposition to become a priest, the way others have one to become a painter or a cricket player.

What about you, Your Holiness?

It's for you.

Holy Christ!

If only I were!

How did you get in here?

With a duplicate of your keys.

Now what do you want?

Everything you were supposed to do but haven't done yet.

I've tried.

But it's impossible.

That gentleman is the Pope, he's the man of the greatest virtue and rectitude on the planet, and I've never been much of a seductress myself.

Neither was the Virgin Mary.

But that didn't keep her from becoming... the most attractive and desired woman on earth.

But I'm just a good Catholic girl.

Good Catholic girls, especially the married ones, don't cheat on their husbands.

But I didn't come here to threaten you, nor to remind you of your sins.

You are an intelligent woman and you should know.

What should I know?

That you're beautiful, you're attractive, and the Pope has a particular interest in you.

He only cares about my sorrow.

Peter and I can't have children.

That's not the way it is.

What I'm about to tell you is confidential, eternally so: Esther, the Holy Father's faith isn't as solid as we like to think.

What are you saying?

I insist. Moreover, he's had dozens of girlfriends.

He's a loose man.

Your job is to seduce the Holy Father.

We will take care of everything else.

I wouldn't know how to go about it.

And I don't want to wind up tangled... in a public scandal that would ruin my life.

Silly girl... There won't be any public scandal.

All that's needed is the threat of scandal to turn things around.

What things?

The Holy Father intends to issue new measures that could lead irreversibly to the extinction of the Church.

Do you understand what significant stakes we're talking about?

Me, you, all of us have the sacrosanct duty to stop him, in God's name.

But I could try to talk to him. He respects me.

Sorry, I was about to laugh, but I stopped myself, because I have a certain class.

We seriously doubt that Pius XIII even respects God.

You don't know him at all.

He's an extraordinary person.

That's why you are so seductive, Esther.

Because you don't know a thing.

Now, go and seduce him.

I don't want to sin anymore.

If only that were possible, Esther.

If only!

Friends, good evening!

Today we are here with a very very special guest.

Let's start from the beginning. What's your name?

Tonino Pettola.

Tonino, what kind of work do you do?

I'm a shepherd. I herd sheep.

So, a flock.

You need to know that Tonino Pettola has a flock of sheep, and a few years ago he started to see the Madonna.

Right, Tonino?

Yes.

When did you have your first vision?

The day I got... the stigmata!

The stigmata!

Unbelievable! Tonino, show us your stigmata.

No... ok, ok, thanks!

Ladies and gentlemen, it's incredible.

This is truly amazing!

I'm close to him, and I assure you, these are genuine stigmata!

Tonino, please tell us about this vision.

In the middle of my flock, a young woman appeared, full of light.

Yes.

It was Mary.

It was the Madonna.

And the Madonna spoke to you, Tonino, right?

What did She say? Yes.

She said: Tonino...

You are a descendant of Mine and also of Padre Pio.

You have the Light.

You have the power to see Me, and to heal the sick.

You have...

In any case, my friends, let me say that...

Tonino Pettola lives here in Montecruccoli, and for the past two years, since he began having visions, thousands of faithful have come from all over Europe, right?

Just to see him, to meet him, to touch him, to ask him for a miracle.

Tonino, you've already done some healings, right?

Yes.

After six months the healings began.

The Madonna...

Yes... listens to Tonino... particularly in regard to cardiovascular diseases and meniscus problems.

Useful!

In fact, a lot of athletes have come here to Montecruccoli.

Pallotta, the soccer star...

Yes, we say hello to him!

.. expected to be benched for 6 months with torn ligaments, but after Tonino touched him, he recovered.

The following Sunday he was back on the field.

He even scored a double.

With his right foot, which is not his good one.

Incredible. This story is incredible!

You should know that Tonino receives only 100 people at a time.

Otherwise, he says, the miracles won't happen.

Isn't that right, Tonino?

Yes, that's right.

And I'd like to say that we don't ask for money.

No, no, no.

And there's nothing illegal here.

I have a gift, and I want to put it to use to serve the needy.

And that's really beautiful...

We know that something is bothering you.

Tonino is heartbroken. Tonino is heartbroken because unfortunately the Church refuses to recognize his abilities.

And this pains you.

But today we'd like to put our show at your disposal, which, as you know, is very popular, to speak directly to the cardinals who are listening.

And why not? Maybe even to the Pope!

Because maybe the Pope is watching us too!

Tonino, what do you want to say to the Pope?

There?

Yes there!

Holy Father... why won't you believe me?

We sent you... all the documents, but you returned them unopened.

I am real.

I'm not lying.

I am so devoted, so in love with God, that the Madonna answered my prayers.

And she appeared to me.

I don't want money.

I just want you to say that I am one of you.

I don't want to found a Church of my own.

But if you in Rome continue to call me a fraud, then I'll be forced to found a church of my own.

They all want it... all the faithful flocking here to see me.

What should I do, Holy Father?

Please tell me.

Please tell me.

If he perhaps wants to tell me.

Jump.

Jump.

Something odd has been happening in the last few hours.

Let's hear it.

During confession, for reasons that escape me, people have suddenly started recounting their exploits with women, offering up the most intimate, embarrassing details.

Strange, isn't it?

Someone must be spreading a rumor that the Pope is out to punish the homosexuals.

Oh, yes, the famous calumnies of our little State.

What if they weren't calumnies?

I don't want to sin anymore, Ester said through her tears.

I've heard more people say that than anything else in my life.

And they all believe what they say.

She also believed what she said.

Poor girl.

She doesn't know that up to the very last day that we are able to think, we are condemned to go on sinning.

That's why I need you, Girolamo.

You are my oasis.

You are my salvation.

You, Girolamo, are the only soul in the world without sin.

Only you, Girolamo, can truly touch the hem of holiness.

You, who do not know... and will never know what it means to live inside a wrong life every single day.

Forgive me.

Forgive me if you can, Girolamo.

Goodnight, Don Tommaso.

Goodnight, Holy Father.

Let's go in the bedroom.

No.

Where?

Here.

All right.

Virgin Mary, Mother of God, Peter's successor has a specific grace to ask of You.

Now, right now, those two young people in their home, Peter and Esther, have only one wish.

You must grant it to them.

You must.

You must.

You must. You must.

You must.

You must. You must!

You must.

You must, must.

You must. You must.

You must.

You must, please.

You must.

Amen.

They're taking their afternoon nap.

The fat one is snoring.

Yes, she is Mother Letizia.

She's the metronome of sleep.

I've made an important decision.

What?

You will go to New York to investigate the Kurtwell case.

Why do you want to punish me, Holy Father?

This is no punishment, this is a promotion.

I trust you.

Holy Father, spare me.

I'm a modest, limited man, believe me.

The Kurtwell case is something far too big for me, beyond my scope.

Quit selling yourself short. You're going to New York.

You'll investigate.

You'll gather the necessary evidence, and you'll put Kurtwell into my hands.

My Papacy won't let the harm done to even a single child slip away into indifference.

And you will help me, because I trust you.

Blindly!

Holy Father, I am a recluse.

I only know how to live inside these walls.

In all these years, I've left here only twice, both times to go to the hospital.

I don't know how to cross the street, I don't know how to get a hotel room, I don't know how to order a meal in a restaurant.

I'm like those canaries in cages.

If you free them, they die.

You're afraid.

I was afraid too before I accepted my destiny as head of the Church.

How do you overcome fear?

By giving in to the complex and unfathomable architecture that God has designed for us.

Be calm, Bernardo. Be calm.

The boy has become a man.

But I will continue to protect the boy.

Where do afternoons land?

Where do May afternoons land?

The boy has become a man.

I land here.

Yes. That's true.

But I will continue to protect the boy.


All of us cardinals were there, at the Conclave.

We were on the fourth ballot, the famous total stalemate.

I looked at Cardinal Dussolier, a longshot for the Papacy, we've known each other since we were kids, We've shared every suffering imaginable.

I looked at tall, stoop-shouldered Cardinal Spencer, my mentor, the most eligible of all the candidates, looking so wise.

I've always been suspicious of wisdom.

I'm convinced he was already drafting his first papal address in his head, maybe even composing his first encyclical.

I looked and looked at them.

And then I prayed to God.

You did well to pray.

At any rate, it is the Holy Spirit who must illumine...

This was the prayer I muttered between my teeth: Lord, I don't care with what means, licit or illicit, they're all fine, I don't care about the Holy Spirit, whether He illumines me or not, I don't care about anything, I don't care about your opinions, or if I'm up to the task, or if I'm not an outsider or a longshot, I don't care if you think I'm weak, or a scoundrel, I don't care about loving my neighbor as myself, I will never love my neighbor as myself, I only care about one thing, Lord, that I, not the others, can be useful to You.

I prayed some more, harder this time.

I was praying so hard I nearly sh1t my pants.

I had to glue my ass to my chair so as not to make a mess, I stared, straight to Dussolier and I said: God, not him, me.

I looked at Spencer and I said: God, not him, me.

I must have chanted those words a thousand times before they opened the voting again, like a mantra: not him, me, not him, me, not him, me, not him, me.

And then, toward the end: not them, me.

And now I'm the Pope.

Not them.

Me.

Sister Mary would call it a miracle.

Others would call it the answer to a prayer.

But I don't know what to call it.

They all went white when they heard the name I'd chosen, and I reveled in their fear.

They were beginning to realize who I am, because that is the enormous error they committed: they chose a pope they didn't know.

And today they began to understand.

That is their tremendous sin: they chose a Pope they presumed they knew.

I spoke my new name, Pius XIII, and they forgot to thank God because they thought that God had failed to illumine them.

I forgot to thank God, because I didn't think God had illumined them either.

I love myself more than my neighbor, more than God, I believe only in myself, I am the lord omnipotent: Lenny, you have illumined yourself! f*ck!

We had a deal, Angelo!

Me pope, you reconfirmed the Secretary of State.

The perfect balance.

But then you broke our agreement.

You pulled that kid out of the hat.

My own student.

You really are a sh1t!

You won't be able to manage him, you know.

You must have learned that by now, after that homily he gave.

How stupid can you be!

You were so fearful of my extremis, that you forgot the most obvious truth: the young are always more extreme than the old.

But there is another truth, Michael.

What other truth?

That you were afraid old Spencer would be beyond your control?

Well, now you got yourself a young Spencer.

The Church is gonna be in his clutches for a long time.

And it's not even a given that you'll be reconfirmed.

I don't understand, what are you getting out of all this?

You don't understand because you don't allow me to tell you the truth.

And what truth would that be?

I didn't plot against you.

I didn't direct my men to vote for Belardo.

Sure, I let people believe that was the case, so as to maintain my power.

But that's not how it went.

At a certain point, without anyone giving instructions, Belardo started winning votes.

That is the unspeakable truth, Michael.

Don't f*ck with me, Angelo!

What do you expect me to believe?

That what we witnessed in there...

...was the breath of the Holy Spirit.

I think so, Michael, I really do.

I believe the Holy Spirit breathed.

You're out of your mind.

Michael, the Holy Spirit breathed.

Forgive me, Lord, for I have been unforgiveable.

It's not true that I illumine myself. You illumine me.

It's not true that I feel omnipotent.

You are the Lord Omnipotent.

It's not true that I don't care about anything.

The only thing I care about is You.

You alone.

And if I've forgotten to thank You, I thank You now.

And if I've sinned by presumption, I ask Your forgiveness now.

And if I've tricked that poor Don Tommaso, I ask Your forgiveness now.

And if I have frightened people, I ask Your forgiveness now.

And if I have wished Spencer and Dussolier harm, I ask You send harm my way as well.

And if I have abused my power, I ask You to take it from me now.

Forgive me, Lord, illumine me.

Give me the words to say to the cardinals.

My address regards You.

My words are Your words.

I keep praying for You to make something happen, so why this awful, crawling feeling that nothing ever does?

I know, dictate to me Lord.

Yes, dictate to me.

I've always been good at taking notes, You know that.

You know that.

Your Excellency, can I race my toy cars on the carpet?

Excellency you can say to your mom!

You have to call me: Eminence.

Eminence, so can I...

Do you know how much that carpet costs?

Twice the GDP of your entire Country.

Cane sugar for me, please.

You have to buy your own cane sugar, Aguirre, because frankly the stuff makes me want to puke.

It's been four hundred years since a Pope took such a hostile stance toward the faithful.

In any case, I have to talk with the Pope soon.

I'll make a point of divining his intentions.

Divining his intentions?

Voiello, you'd said: I report to you, the Pope reports to me.

His speech was just one false step.

We have a young Pope.

Have you been reading the paper?!

They're all asking, what is the Cardinal Secretary of State doing?

I know what to do.

What we need... is a dramatic gesture..

Voiello, you need to hand in your resignation today.

Excellent!

That's what you'll do, Voiello.

It's a genuine miracle that this assembly generated an idea.

A first-rate idea.

I'm willing to bet, that in the aftermath of my homily, you're ready to hand in your resignation.

I wouldn't even think of it, Holy Father.

Were you hurt not to hear the homily you drafted for me?

Frustration is an emotion that does not appertain to the Secretary of State.

Did you like my homily?

That's not the point.

Then let's hear the point.

The point is that the faithful were, to put it euphemistically, surprised.

More than surprised, they were overwhelmed.

God overwhelms.

God frightens.

Priorities?

Your speech to our brother cardinals.

In due time. Anything else?

The Kurtwell case, Holy Father.

The big hot potato.

Exactly, Holy Father.

Your predecessor didn't have time to put someone in charge of this delicate matter.

But I will. In due time.

With all due respect, Holy Father, the time is now.

The charges of the child-abuse are detailed and embarrassing and Kurtwell's attitude is, to say the least, defiant and insolent.

Anything else?

Holy Father, it's my duty to inform you that the press and the TV news, after attacking us over your inaugural speech, have now begun a new phase in which they ask us to clarify the meaning of your statements.

Typical plebeian reaction: to hate when you do not understand.

How are we going to put over the idea that the world press corps has difficulty understanding the basic concepts?

A potential compromise might be to call a press conference to explain things.

I don't appear, I don't explain.

Not you, Holy Father.

I could go myself to give an interview.

We no longer give interviews, Your Eminence.

The only interviews we give are to God.

Too bad he hasn't requested one yet, it would be quite the scoop.

Holy Father, the press is begging for a photo of you.

No.

Holy Father, it's Cardinal Ozolins.

Let him in. I've been expecting him.

You wished to see me, Your Holiness?

Yes, and for the last time, Ozolins.

Come with me.

Now... close your eyes and choose your new destination.

What have I done wrong, Holy Father?

Nothing.

It's just that your role under the previous three Popes was to organize their travels.

A role which I intend to radically rescale, because this Pope won't be wasting time roaming the world.

As a result, I no longer need you.

It would be beneath your stature as a cardinal to accept a diminished role so...

Then why do I get the impression that you're out to diminish me even further?

Because it's true!

Now close your eyes and plant a finger on the globe.

Close your eyes.

Ketchikan, Alaska!

Actually, Holy Father, San Francisco is what turned up.

You're not right there, Ozolins.

Ketchikan, Alaska.

It's a lovely place, I've been there..

A nice little town, population 8,000.

You'll like it.

Is it cold there?

Oh, yeah, it's freezing.

But don't forget Nobel laureate Joseph Brodsky's wonderful words: Beauty at low temperatures is beauty.

Holy Father, a little gift for you.

Blessed Father, this is a very useful object, but only if you open it.

You see?

It can be perfectly useful even when it's closed.

Your Holiness, will you allow me, given my venerable age, a vaguely critical observation?

Yes, I allow you.

To expect a devoted and adoring crowd to ponder the enigma of God's existence amounts to asking an obsolete question.

The question now is not whether God exists, but rather, why do we depend on God?

You surprised me, Holy Father.

You're so young... and yet you have such old ideas.

You're wrong about that. I'm an orphan.

And orphans are never young.

But the majority of the churchgoers are not orphans.

Says who?

Do you really think the only orphans are those without a mother and father?

Even if it were true, as an orphan grows older, he may discover a fresh youth within.

We're gonna hold a press conference.

Voiello will be happy to face the press.

Voiello won't be facing the press, you will.

Me? I'm not up to the challenge.

I wouldn't know how to respond.

You won't be expected to respond. You'll be expected to affirm.

Affirm what I am going to dictate to you.

You look on edge to me.

You always ask rhetorical questions.

Why don't you just tell me why I'm on edge?

You're upset because of the press conference.

You've never held one.

Exactly.

And you're depressed because you wanted to do it.

True, but not because I want to be in the spotlight.

I would have been happy for a chance to publicly reassure the bishops, who've been calling me from all over the world, in a general state of alarm.

Can I ask what your general stance will be at the press conference?

No, you cannot.

Tell the truth, you would have preferred Spencer as pope.

Spencer has always been smarter than the rest of us, but also more fragile.

That's why I worked against his election.

Have you ever considered becoming the pope yourself?

No.

A pope needs to inspire trust.

I inspire the opposite.

But the question that distresses me is: what inspires Pope Pius XIII?

Everyone wants to see him, and he refuses to be seen.

The faithful expect reassurance, and instead he offers only unsettling comments.

I can't figure out what he has in mind.

What kind of Church is he looking for?

You tell me, does he have a plan?

I really have to tell you, Sister Mary: this Pope is strange and contradictory.

Just like you.

Just like me?

Just like you!

What can you say about a man who lives in an 6,500-square-foot apartment with a private sauna... and a billiard table, surrounded by fine tapestries, goldsmithery, damasks, and expensive artworks, but who also takes the time, and energy at night to babysit a disabled boy.

You're unbeatable, Sister Mary.

No one's unbeatable, Your Eminence.

It's a matter of patience, which means it's a matter of time.

And that's what I ask of you: time and patience.

And you're not worried?

No, I'm not.

Michael, I'm worried.

Lenny has barely begun and already they're abandoning him in droves.

They should have thought about it before, during the Conclave.

Well now you need to give it some thought.

I've done everything that's within my power to do.

It's up to you!

What are you raving about?

Lenny needs concepts and visions.

I can't help with that, but you can.

You are his spiritual father.

I'm just a tired old man.

And history has passed me by.

You're just a man who's pissed off because you didn't get what you wanted most.

And now you're being spiteful.

A man of your prominence, wallowing in such childishness: aren't you ashamed of yourself, Michael?

The boy has become a man.

He's the father now.

And I must obey him.

Those are the rules.

You're just spouting bullshit and you know it.

He needs you and you refuse to help him in the name of your bottomless vanity.

You will answer for this, before God and in your ravaged conscience.

Lenny doesn't want my help.

He just wants me to approve of his mistakes.

That's what every son wants from their fathers.

So summon him and withhold your approval.

That's what all good fathers do with their sons.

The Pope has dictated the following statement: I, Pius XIII, Bishop of Rome, Vicar of Jesus Christ, Successor of the Prince of the Apostles, Supreme Pontiff of the Universal Church, Primate of Italy, Archbishop and Metropolitan of the Province of Rome, Sovereign of the State of Vatican City, and Servant of the Servants of God, wish to inform you of my total indifference to your doubts and criticism, in light of which I deem it necessary to reiterate my infallibility in contrast to your human fallibility.

Is this Pope claiming divine status?

And by virtue of the prerogative, which is dogmatically sanctioned by the supremacy of the Roman Pontiff, I will not tolerate any delays or compromises as I carry out my plan.

What plan?

We didn't understand anything about the plan.

And once more we don't understand who you are?

Me?

I'm Sister Mary.

Who is Sister Mary?

Holy Father, Cardinal Spencer would be pleased to have you call on him this evening, if you wouldn't mind.

What unforgivable weakness!

There was no need to drag out a bunch of old absurdities from the past.

All you had to do was smile and greet the crowd.

I don't smile and I don't greet.

Did all those years you spend studying with me do you no good at all?

Yes, they taught me to think for myself.

Ah, and this is what you thought all by yourself?

To set every Christian and journalist in the world against you in the first week of your Papacy?

This is part of my plan too.

What plan?

What plan?

Absence is presence.

These are the fundamentals of mystery.

The mystery that will be at the center of my Church.

Mystery is a serious matter, it's not some marketing strategy.

Out there, everyone must learn that it takes sacrifice and suffering to find God.

It's too easy to come to terms with God as the sun is setting.

They have to find Him in the cold and the dark of night.

The way I did.

Absence is presence.

Sacrifice and suffering.

I know where these ideas are coming from because I know you even better than you know yourself.

Where are they coming from?

From your own life.

Your parents rejected you, so you've spent your entire life trying to receive them within yourself.

They distanced themselves from you, so you desire them.

And then you, in your unmedicated concide, you presumed that your needs are the same as those of a billion of the Catholics!

Cut out this dime-store psychoanalysis and work with me.

I don't work with nine-year-old boys.

You've never budged from the front gate of that orphanage where one fine day, without explanations, your parents abandoned you.

Cut it out.

May God help us!

You want to make the world pay for the wrong it did you.

You'll be a terrible Pope, the worst and the most dangerous in modern times, and I don't intend to waste the few years I have remaining being an accomplice to a vindictive little boy.

You are drunk.

No. Not enough.

I know that woman.

That's Esther, the wife of Peter.

A Swiss Guard.

Do you still think about me now and then?

I'm begging you, I need to know: do you still think about me now and then?

Let go of me, someone might see us.

So, why did you come get me?

The Holy Father wishes to see you.

Haven't you ever been in the Apostolic Palace before?

Never, in all these years.

Well, what do you think?

It makes you feel uneasy.

It was designed and built with that exact intent.

You wanted to meet me?

Was that clear even from up here?

Why were you standing motionless in the middle of the square?

I wanted you to know.

Know what?

That I loved your homily.

That's not enough!

Because it's not enough to just love it, you also need to perceive it.

I think I perceived it.

And what else did you perceived?

What?

Respect.

What's your name?

All right, let's get started.

Holy Father, I am sure that there is no need to remind you that the cardinals are expecting your speech of thanks and to be sent home.

You're right, there is no need to remind me, but you did it anyway.

What about the papal tiara from Washington?

Apparently it's on its way.

Now: the Kurtwell case.

I have a candidate: a layman, Fabio Claudio Tavarelli.

Highly impartial.

An impartial layman?

Yes, that's Tavarelli.

Your Eminence, you seem a bit impetuous when it comes to the Kurtwell case.

I'm not impetuous. I'm fair.

Among the many things that are fair, let's also remember that the American seminaries run by Kurtwell provide forty percent of all new priests in North America.

Sister Mary, if the intention is to cover up the Kurtwell case...

No one wants to cover anything up, Your Eminence.

But I've already told you that I will oversee the Kurtwell case, and that I will appoint someone I trust.

When, Holy Father?

Later.

When the Holy Spirit illumines me.

Only the Holy Spirit hasn't scheduled a meeting with me yet.

What else do your agenda books tell us?

On Thursday, the Holy Father is scheduled to baptize ninety children from all over Europe.

Must I really subject myself to such torture?

Holy Father, the church tends to attach a fair amount of importance to baptism.

Anything a little more stimulating?

In light of the statements made at the press conference, newspapers around the world have just begun to unlease holy hell.

Well, that's always the first step on the path to paradise.

I see.

I'm not the one dispensing jokes in the Vatican anymore, Your Holiness, now it's you.

Your Eminence, first of all: I suggest you recover as soon as possible your legendary, fake courtesy.

And secondly: my jokes contain the truth.

You know something, Holy Father?

You are as handsome as Jesus, but you are not actually Jesus.

I may actually be more handsome, but keep that to yourself.

Cardinal Spencer, in a private conversation between the two of us, alluded to certain machinations that led to my being elected Pope.

He was unwilling to acquaint me with the details.

I'm not going to insist with Spencer, but I am with you, Voiello.

So, tell me exactly the dynamics that went on to see me elected.

Tell me right now, or what you've seen so far will be nothing but a foretaste of the macabre banquet that will bring on the ruin of the Church.

Explain it all, right here, right now, because even a second later will be too late.

Are you telling me that you're behaving irrationally with the faithful, the Vatican Curia, and the mass media because you were kept out of the loop on the behind-the-scenes machinations that led to your election?

No.

I am ordering you, beginning with your next utterance, to tell me why I was elected, and what my election was supposed to mean to you all.

In truth, the Holy Spirit...

You were not supposed to be the man of the Providence, you were supposed to be the Pope of compromise.

What do you mean by compromise?

Your prudence as a cardinal was interpreted as a potential bridge between the progressive positions so dear to me and the more conservative ones so dear to Spencer.

You were considered to be a synthesis.

A happy synthesis, pleasing both to the Holy Spirit and myself, the great elector who, believing in you and your young talent, influenced a majority of cardinals.

Now, for reasons that are unclear to me, you no longer want to be a bridge.

And this is only the beginning.

Why are you doing this?

Why did you change?

A Pope is not a cardinal.

A cardinal works in a collegial manner, while a Pope is an absolute sovereign.

f*ck, you were supposed to share your sovereignty with my advice and Spencer's!

Not like this!

A decidedly undiplomatic response, Your Eminence.

You're right, Holy Father, and I humbly beg your forgiveness.

I'm not sure that's enough.

Do you want my resignation?

I'm not sure that's enough.

Tell Valente to go to the archives and bring the procedure for deposing a cardinal.

May I ask you both to leave us for a moment?

Your Eminence, would you have me believe that I am Pope thanks to you.

But you and I both know that's not the truth.

But if the Pope thinks he can depose the Secretary of State without all the grave repercussions that are bound to ensue, then it means that he really understands nothing about the way things work here.

You have no idea of how vast my powers are, here and beyond the walls of Vatican City.

You braved this terrible storm out of fear you might lose your cardinalate?

Out of fear I might lose the Church.

Go away.

I don't wanna talk to you anymore.

You're a traitor and a fool.

And I don't know which one is worse.

Wait.

I didn't come alone.

What's he doing?

He's lifting the weight of God.

And what is the weight of God like, Michael?

Very fragile.

It's extremely fragile.

Which is why you are going to help us to fortify God.

I tried.

It's hopeless.

No, Michael.

We have to spend... our whole lives trying.

We have to try right till the moment of our death.

That's what priests do.

We give God's...

...weight!

I beg your forgiveness, Lenny.

Forgive me.

I've come to tell you that I've changed my mind.

I'll gladly accept the position of Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy.

I'm sorry, Michael, it's too late.

There is no position left open for you.

One more thing, Cardinal Spencer.

What?

Address me as Your Holiness.

Blessed Father, I am the bishop of Belluno, but I speak for all the other bishops of Italy and nearly all the parish priests.

It behooves me to inform you that something anomalous is happening.

Your words to the faithful have sown doubt and, worse, fear.

Many of them are afraid... to set foot inside their parish church again, they come to us, eager for an explanation.

In other words, they're scared.

What truly made our church great?

Fear or tolerance?

What can we learn from the history of our Church?

How great was the papal state when fear among nations was part of our DNA?

How small did we become, how greatly did our influence decline, when we decided to yield.

To succumb, to withdraw, to become accommodating and reassuring?

This place, these people, placate my sense of disquiet, all my anxieties, both ancient and modern.

It's nice and cold, Holy Father.

I don't doubt it, Sister.

Would you be so kind as to bring me three oranges, as well?

Certainly, Holy Father.

I so wish that I could have been thunderstruck, as you were, one May afternoon, in the heart of the Church.

Instead...

I became a priest for lack of a better alternative.

From the orphanage with Sister Mary I went straight to the seminary under the protection of Monsignor Spencer.

Then he became Cardinal Spencer.

But between the end of school and the beginning of seminary I had a week of vacation.

It was the first time I'd ever been out in the world on my own.

I went to California, and there I went to the beach.

And on that beach...

I won over a homely girl who seemed at the time to be the most beautiful girl in the world.

How did you win her over?

Please, tell me.

Thank you.

You're welcome, Holy Father.

Like this.

We were together for a week.

And then, I entered the seminary.

This is the first time I've told anyone about it.

Your Eminence, what, what are you doing in my room?

My dear Gutierrez, have you ever asked yourself how I've managed to run the papal State for all these years?

Many times.

What 's your answer?

It requires a great overarching vision, I imagine.

Precisely the opposite.

No vision whatsoever, but by placing importance on the irrelevant things.

And do you know how I manage to learn all the irrelevant things that no one wants to tell me?

No... how?

By learning people's secrets and threatening to reveal those secrets to the Pope.

One bottle of gin doesn't make an alcoholic of me.

Agreed.

One bottle doesn't.

But a whole liquor store full does.

Who told you I'm an alcoholic?

I forgot to confide in you another stratagem for running the Church: never reveal your sources.

And if for some reason you have to, make them up.

Now, my very dear Bernardo, let's not waste any more time.

You tell me about the irrelevant things that you and the Pope say to each other and I will never tell anyone that I got them from you.

If on the other hand you refuse to tell me, I will reveal your serious problem to the Pope, and I'll have you sent away from the Vatican once and for all.

And you, outside of these walls, will be a lost man, because you are a fearful man.

What do you want me to say?

We, we don't talk about anything of significance, really.

Today, for instance, he told me... with some nostalgia about a girlfriend he had when he was just a kid.

You see, things like that, that's the height of what he confides in me.

Stupid, silly things.

I knew it!

What did you know, Your Eminence?

That the Church is female!

Holy Father...

I have to ask you a somewhat unseemly question.

There are no unseemly questions between you and me, Monsignor.

Because... because you and I respect each other.

What remained with you from your experience with the girl...

...in California?

The memory of her eyes.

At first, eyes full of love, then later eyes full of disappointment.

And that was an important lesson.

I understood that I want Catholics in love and I no longer want to see disappointment in their eyes.

Never again.

Still, at the same time, I occasionally find myself unable to believe my own words.

I don't believe my thoughts, I don't believe in my will, I don't believe in my abilities.

I'm speaking to you from the heart, monsignor.

There are times... there are certain times, or possibly always...

In short, there are times when I don't believe.

There are times when I think it might be better to leave it all in Voiello's hands.

He knows how to do things.

He believes in what he says.

And he still believes in God.

No, Holy Father.

No.

Voiello is a politician.

You are the Pope.


Say something, Esther.

I love you.

Say something else.

No.

You don't love me.

Yes, I do.

But love's not enough for you.

s*x has its own rules.

s*x only has one rule: procreation.

No...

Are you Sister Mary?

Never call me Sister Mary.

Call me Ma'.

Ok.

You've aged, Andrew, but you've kept your good looks.

You've aged too, Ma, but you haven't.

I should have followed my instincts and broken open the alms box and then spent all the money on a good plastic surgeon.

You have ever regretted becoming a nun?

No! If I hadn't become a nun, I never would have raised my two precious jewels: you and Lenny.

The Pope is a jewel. I'm just a bungling missionary priest.

You're both jewels, Andrew. And besides, you're a cardinal.

Yeah. Which means nothing. Absolutely nothing.

But we aren't here to talk about me, Ma. How's our pope?

In seventh heaven!

In seventh heaven, right.

I mean, who would ever imagined that Lenny would become pope!

Me.

I should go now.

It's never a good idea for a nun to be in a cardinal's room.

Well, if you see our Pope, tell him to hurry up and give his address, because I would like to get back to my good works.

Or bad ones, that remains to be seen.

Don't you like it here?

This place smells like incense and death.

I prefer the smell of sh1t and life.

You haven't changed at all, I see.

And you, Ma?

Will you change?

Now that you've become a powerful woman?

Good morning.

Good morning.

I don't know if it's a good idea, Sofia.

I'm afraid it's premature.

Premature, Your Eminence?

The time it takes to develop and update the merchandise, it means we have to move right away, before the fakes start appearing.

The crooks are always so much faster, who knows how they do it.

Criminal organizations are faster because they don't forgive inefficiency.

At the risk of seeming too materialistic, Your Eminence, do you know how much the Vatican coffers lose for every day that passes without any new papal merchandizing on the market?

Not exactly.

Wow.

Now do you understand why I need the Holy Father's immediate approval?

Yes, I do. But you don't know him.

And believe me, he's not an easy one.

He's a difficult, unpredictable man.

So? I'm a difficult, unpredictable woman.

True. Which is precisely why I'm worried.

Let me handle it. You'll see, it'll go fine.

Help us, Pipita.

Who's Saint Pipita?

He's not a saint, he's the center forward for Napoli.

What a lame joke.

I see you've lost your optimism along with your sense of humor.

Sense of humor is irrelevant for the Secretary of State.

May I smoke as well, Holy Father?

Unfortunately not.

His Holiness John Paul II, in his day, forbid it.

May I tell you something, Holy Father?

That's why we're here.

With all due respect, seen from up close, you are an extraordinarily handsome man.

I had asked to meet the Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy before anyone else, and you, I think it's safe to deduce, are not the Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy.

No, but I would like to be.

So would I. But they made me Pope, instead.

I'm in charge of marketing here in Vatican City.

Did you study marketing in college?

At Harvard, to be precise.

Don't sound so cocky.

The word Harvard may impress people around here, but to an American, it means one thing only: decline.

Did you know that when the Archbishop of Boston would visit Harvard, he'd boast to everyone that he never washed his feet?

It was public knowledge, and at Easter, at the washing of the feet, everyone was terrified that the Archbishop of Boston might be chosen.

As soon as I became his superior, I sent him three envelopes.

In the first was a letter transferring him to Alaska, in the second was some soap, and in the third a note card on which I'd written: choose.

And what did he choose?

The soap.

I imagined.

Right. But what you couldn't possibly have imagined was the fourth letter I sent him.

Excellent choice, Archbishop, I wrote.

You'll find plenty of water in Alaska.

A most edifying anecdote, Holy Father.

But I don't want to waste your time, so let me come right to the point of my visit.

Please.

As you know, Your Holiness, the Vatican holds a monopoly on the production of any and all merchandise with an image of the Pope on it.

Today's papal turnover requires us to come up with new designs, which we will then need to get into production as quickly as possible.

All those items with the Holy Father's picture on them, which the faithful just love and which make up a sizable slice of the Vatican budget.

I see. Go on.

What would be required then is a brief photo shoot, which will then enable us to get into production as soon as possible a series of items displaying Your Holiness's picture: key chains, postcards, ashtrays, lighters, picture cards, plates...

Plates?

Yes, of course, Holy Father, plates too.

In addition to the usual plastic plates, which sell for five euro, we were thinking of something more refined.

It occurred to us that we might commission a special plate from Vietri, in Campania.

The craftsmen there do the most marvelous decorations, so naturally we were thinking of creating a plate with your portrait right in the center, painted by the very best Vietri's craftsmen.

Nice. And how much would it sell for?

Forty-five euro, at least. Ah, a reasonable price.

I would say so, considering that we're talking about a craftsmanship, Holy Father, handmade, not some cheap factory production.

Perhaps we could send one to all the heads of State.

An excellent idea, Your Eminence.

Good, very good.

Very good.

Good. - Very good.

Yes, very, very good.

Very, very good.

Good.

Wait a minute. I'll be right back.

Good.

Where did he go?

To get a gun, I imagine.

Come on! It went fine.

Do you see this plate, ma'am?

Yes... of course I see it.

Good.

This is the sort of merchandise I'm prepared to authorize.

But it doesn't have your image on it!

I do not have an image, my good lady, because I am no one.

Do you understand? No one.

Only Christ exists.

Only Christ.

And I'm not worth forty-five, or even five euros.

I am worth nothing.

I don't understand, Holy Father.

Of course you don't, because, as you said earlier, you studied at Harvard.

And Harvard is a place in decline, where you were taught to lower yourselves.

Whereas here, in the Vatican, we try to elevate ourselves.

Who exactly is in charge of curating the image of the Pope?

The Secretary of State entrusted that delicate task to me, Holy Father, two years ago.

Very good. And now I'm going to tell you what you, as curator of the image of the Holy Father, are gonna do.

You are gonna fire the Vatican's official photographer immediately.

No photographs of the Pope are to be issued.

Just as there were none when I was a cardinal or a bishop.

Do you know why? I never allowed my picture to be taken.

And when someone manage to sneak a photograph of me, I always bought them up before they could be published.

Now that I think about it, I've been training my whole life to be an invisible pope.

And so, for my first address, you will see to it that the light is so dim, no photographer, no TV cameraman, and not even the faithful will see anything of me but a dark shadow, my silhouette.

They will not see me because I do not exist.

If I may, Holy Father, what you are proposing is nothing short of suicide, media suicide.

Media suicide, you say?

Fine, now try to keep up with me, if you can.

I'm right with you, Holy Father.

Good.

Ok, so, who is the most important author of the last twenty years?

Careful now, not the best, virtuosity is for the arrogant, the most important, the author who has sparked so much morbid curiosity that he became the most important?

I wouldn't know. I'd say... Philip Roth.

No. Salinger.

The most important film director?

Spielberg.

No. Kubrick.

Contemporary artist?

Jeff Koons. Or Marina Abramovic.

Banksy. Electronic music group?

I don't know the first thing about electronic music.

You say Harvard is a good university! Anyway, Daft Punk.

The best Italian female vocalist?

Mina?

Very good!

Now do you know what it is, what the invisible red thread is that connects them all, all these most important figures in their respective fields?

None of them let themselves be seen.

None of them let themselves be photographed.

But you're not an artist, Holy Father. You are a head of State.

Yes, of a city state so small that it has no outlet to the sea, and in order to survive, its leader has to make himself as unreachable as a rock star.

The Vatican survives thanks to hyperbole.

So we, we shall generate hyperbole, but this time in reverse.

I'm beginning to get your point, Holy Father.

Yes, not only am I beginning to get it, I'm beginning to like it, too.

Good, very good.

Childhood?

His parents, both hippies, abandon him at an orphanage, and they give fake names to Sister Mary making it impossible for Lenny to find them.

Sister Mary's orphanage has ties to Cardinal Spencer's university.

Spencer at that time was in New York.

Of all her little orphans, the only one she recommends to him was Lenny.

A British newspaper got the scoop with the headline The Pope smokes.

And this is how the world responded.

At Spencer's side we're familiar with the direction his career takes.

Lenny succeeds him when Spencer is called to the Curia.

Very young, he takes over the entire Archdiocese of New York.

He is a cardinal at the age of 42.

But if Lenny was so submissive, so dull... why did Spencer favor him so much?

Precisely because he never threatened Spencer's boundless ego.

And besides, Spencer has always preferred servile underlings.

But now, he's the one who has to serve that little boy.

Lenny's moral conduct?

Irreproachable.

No gossip, no insinuations even.

No love affairs. Nothing.

Sexual orientation?

Unknown.

And what do you think his sexual orientation is?

None.

He only cares about the Church.

And the Church is female.

Dear Pope, what do I have to do to believe in God?

Tommy, Amarillo, Texas.

I want us to write back to all the children.

Of course, Holy Father.

And how would you respond to this child, Eminence?

I....

You'd write back and say:

Dear Tommy, think of all the things you like.

There, that's what God is.

I knew it, there are mice in here.

That's no mouse.

A gift from the Australian Foreign Minister, Holy Father.

We thought we would donate it to the bio park.

What do you mean bio park?

The zoo.

Not on your life.

You can come out, sweetie.

We'll set him free in the gardens.

Do you intend to follow me even in my more private moments?

I wasn't following you. I too enjoy communing with nature.

Well, what do you know?

Just one day, and we've already discovered we have something in common.

Don't be funny with me.

I've never been more serious.

And worried. About the Pope.

The Pope is a saint. Let him be the one to worry about you.

Yes, I've been told he chats with kangaroos, a San Francis of Sydney.

By saint I don't mean a good man.

I mean he's literally a saint.

The Holy Father and you would do well to be a little more humble.

The Vatican is a State.

There is politics, finances, there are delicate balances and grave dangers, if those balances are upset.

Yes, but there are also lobbies, internal tensions, scandals, vendettas, and threats.

All of this the Holy Father understands only too well.

His bizarre refusal to show himself in public is just crazy.

To reveal his eyes, right now, maybe too much, too much for the world.

I'm afraid I don't follow you.

You will, one day.

At any rate, let me reassure you that we intend to tackle all the concerns that you have raised, one by one.

We? Who's we? You and the Pope?

Do we have two popes now?

We also intended tackle the question of the Secretary of State.

It's a good thing you've come, Sister Mary, I was getting bored.

I must admit, you're a first-class adversary.

At any rate, here is the address I wrote for him.

I worked on it all night long.

It's a good address. It's well balanced, prudent, and takes account of various positions.

It's diplomatic, in other words.

Haven't you realized the Pope is indifferent to diplomacy?

Yes, and wrongly so.

We are an anomalous State, and diplomacy is the only thing we have, other than a handful of buildings and some works of art.

Let me say again, it's a good address.

I have infused it with all my the commitment, all my passion.

Have you already seen Dussolier?

Ehm... no. Not yet.

Do you have any ideas for your first address?

Because you could ask Spencer for advice.

I don't need Spencer's advice.

That incident today, with the kangaroo was...

Stop it. It was nothing.

Just chance.

Okay, just chance.

And that time when we were...

Stop it.

Good evening, Eminence.

Good evening.

Yes?

Really?

So, how are you?

I have to tell you a wonderful thing that happened to Higuain.

My dear faithful ones, I'm sorry I'm late.

Laughter from the audience.

But here I am.

Look at me.

Only don't look at me. Look up.

The Pope points to the sky and the stars.

Do you see the sky?

Do you see God? No?

You don't see Him?

No matter.

Now look at the person next to you.

Look joyfully upon him, and remember what Saint Augustine said:

If you want to see God, you have the means to do it.

God is love.

Thank you, Sister Mary.

So, I finally get to meet the Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy.

I've been anxious to see you.

Here I am, Holy Father.

Did you vote for me in the Conclave, Your Eminence?

Not even once.

Why not?

Even though I don't know your ideas, in truth, no one does, you are a pupil of Cardinal Spencer.

Cardinal Spencer is a conservative, a moderate one, but a conservative nonetheless.

I am not a conservative.

I figured that you were probably a conservative as well.

Are you, Holy Father?

What do you think?

I think that if the name you have chosen, Pius XIII, is intended to signal a continuity with Pius XII, then there is the reason for concern.

Let's not forget that Pius XI considered Mussolini to be a man of divine providence.

At any rate, the College of Cardinals was very rash to elect a pontiff whose ideas and... orientation they did not know.

I agree with you.

It was rash.

At any rate, Holy Father, please do not take this as a criticism, or think that this will in any way dampen my obedience.

You asked me a question I considered it my duty to respond truthfully.

I appreciate your sincerity.

I'm going to ask you another question, and you will grant me the courtesy of another sincere answer.

Of course, Holy Father.

Are you homosexual, Your Eminence?

Yes, Holy Father.

Time for your snack, Holy Father.

My snack?

Yes, Holy Father, your snack.

Right, that's what she calls it.

I have to have my snack now.

Goodbye, Your Eminence.

I saw Sister Mary coming out of Cardinal Dussolier's room.

What else?

People are saying that Sister Mary is the real Pope, not you.

Who's saying that?

Cardinal Ozolins.

He's heard it said that Sister Mary uses we when she talks about the Pope.

We will do, we will tackle...

I overheard him talking to the Vatican Secretary of State:

Lenny semper puer, he said.

And how did the Vatican Secretary of State react?

He was impassive. He's a clever devil, that one.

But it's a lie, what Ozolins says.

It is a lie.

Isn't it, Holy Father?

Of course it's a lie.

A woman will never become the pope.

I am the Pope.

Good morning, Mrs. Patan.

Good morning, Cardinal Ozolins.

This office is falling apart, I'm quite fed up.

Give me a hand, Mrs. Patan.

How many times have I said it needs to be renovated?

Ah, here you are. What alacrity.

It's enough to raise one's voice around here for things to get resolved.

The door won't open. The door, the key.

Aguirre!

How can I thank you, Holy Father, for having entrusted the Vatican Museums to me?

There's no need to thank me.

What made you enter the Church, Your Eminence?

Life is so short. I decided to opt for eternity.

Did you receive your calling as an adult?

No, I heard the call.

Right here, when I was sixteen.

Right here, where May afternoons land.

That light spoke to me and said:

Be calm, Bernardo, be calm.

The boy had become a man.

My mother, my father, they were here with me.

They looked at me, but they were no longer themselves.

I was no longer myself.

Where do afternoons land? the voice of conscience asked.

They land here, I replied.

And the voice responded calmly, Yes, it's true, but I will continue to protect the boy.

What have we forgotten?

We have forgotten...

We have forgotten...

What have we forgotten?

We have forgotten... We have forgotten...

What have we forgotten?

We have forgotten...

We have forgotten...

What do you think, Holy Father?

I thought it was beautiful, I thought it was full...

Did I ask your opinion, Sister Mary?

What? No, I just thought... Keep quiet then.

Your address is really beautiful, Eminence.

Balanced, yes, but a balance of love.

Which is exactly what love should be when it is full and resolved.

I, on the other hand, have never truly known what love is.

I have never really lived.

But I've come to the right place, though: a city state filled with lost souls who have never really lived.

Sister Mary?

Sister Mary preferred to dine in her apartment this evening.

What is it you wanted to say to me?

What have you decided about your address?

I've got some very clear ideas about it.

Do you think you might use some of what the Secretary of State wrote?

No.

It's rather weak.

I thought it was beautiful. What a shame, Lenny!

Sister Mary.

Yes, Lenny.

From now on, you are to call me Your Holiness.

As you wish, Your Holiness.

I remembered now what it was I wanted to say to you.

What?

You can let everyone know... that tomorrow evening, at 9:00 p.m., Pope Pius XIII will appear on the balcony of Saint Peter's Basilica and deliver his first official address.

I love you, Michael.

I'm so happy you asked me to come see you.

I couldn't wait to talk with you, Michael, to thank you, and to tell you I owe it all to you that I've gotten this far.

You taught me about life, you taught me about Theology.

I was supposed to be pope.

I know. But that was your mistake.

You could have refused the deal Voiello offered you: me trair para se eleger.

What are you talking about? No one ever offered me a deal.

You liar!

But I don't expect anything from you.

You don't know how to love. Don't talk to me like that. Please.

If you think I'm gonna talk to you differently now that you're Pope, let me tell you something, Lenny, that's never going to happen. Never!

Don't talk to me like that, you're hurting me.

I'm hurting you?

You've ruined my life.

You destroyed any sense of destiny in my life.

So I spoke with Assente.

He confessed to being gay.

It's unacceptable that a homosexual heads the congregation that trains priests. He's out.

That's nuts.

I want you to take his place.

We'll work together side by side, every day.

You can continue to mentor me, just like you've always done.

Are you crazy?

People will say you are just doing a favor for a friend.

Who have you taken me for?

Did you really think I'd accept your charity?

Charity? I don't have the power to make you pope, Michael.

It's not true that you don't have the power to make me pope. You do.

What?

Resign.

I'll win in the next Conclave.

I wouldn't be so sure.

The Conclave is mysterious.

You don't know sh1t! You're just the blue-eyed kid.

The Conclave is merely a place where games get played.

Games in which you were never included.

You're just saying that to hurt me.

I'm saying it... because I'm the one who invented all the games that get played during Conclaves.

If you invented them, then why aren't you pope?

I shall soon find out.

Things went the way they did, Michael.

Please, just accept it and accept the post as Prefect for the Congregation for the Clergy.

You'll be the most powerful man in the whole Church.

And Michael, help me.

I'm begging you, help me write my first speech.

I need you.

But I don't need you, Lenny.

Help me write my speech, I need your advice.

I have no more advice.

Get out of my house, Lenny.

Why did you have me come here, Michael?

To remind you that you're the Pope now.

And you are all alone.

Just as you have always been.

And that you're a nothing.

Nothing!

Your Holiness Pius XIII...

EU SOU VIRGEM MAS ESTA CAMISETA VELHA Tell me about my parents.

Your parents left you at the orphanage, saying they couldn't keep you anymore because they had to go to Venice.

And you didn't ask them what they had to do in Venice?

We didn't ask questions.

What were they like?

I don't remember, Lenny.

I must have seen thousands of parents leave their children with us, I can't remember them all.

I remember them. At least I remember them in my dreams.

In theory, they might still be alive.

Yes. They'd be just over seventy now.

And, in theory, they might still be in Venice.

They could be anywhere, Lenny.

I search everywhere, I pray everywhere.

But I don't see God.

Because I don't see my father. Because I don't see my mother.

I, on the other hand, see everything.

What do you see?

God's plan.

A complex architecture that depends on you, Your Holiness.

Everything is so clear.

Who's in there?

No one.

Go see for yourself if you don't believe me.

All of Vatican City is yours, Holy Father, and so is this apartment.

No one loves me, which is why I am prepared for every kind of vileness, from everyone.

Holy Father, I see Christ's reflection in you.

And in Dussolier?

I see Christ's reflection in him too.

A paler reflection.

Acqua siamo noi Dall'antica sorgente veniamo. Fiumi siamo noi Se i ruscelli si mettono insieme. Mari siamo noi se i torrenti si danno la mano Vita nuova c' se Ges  in mezzo a noi. E allora diamoci la mano e tutti insieme camminiamo. Ed un oceano di pace nascer. E l'egoismo cancelliamo, un cuore limpido sentiamo.  Dio che bagna del suo amor l'umanit. Nuova umanit. Oggi nasce da chi crede in lui. Nuovi siamo noi.

My dear faithful ones, I'm sorry I'm late. But here I am.

Look at me.

Only don't look at me. Look up.

Do you see the sky?

Do you see God?

No?

No matter.

Now look at the person next to you. Look joyfully upon him, and remember what Saint Augustine said: If you want to see God, you have the means to do it. God is love.

Pius! Pius! Pius!

Not now.

Let yourself go, Your Holiness.

And if the saint here were you, Gutierrez?

What have we forgotten?

What have we forgotten?

We have forgotten God.

You! You have forgotten God.

I want to be very clear with you.

You have to be closer to God than to each other.

I am closer to God than I am to you.

You need to know that I will never be close to you.

Because everyone is alone before God.

I have nothing to say to those who have even the slightest doubt about God.

All I can do is remind them of my scorn.

And their wretchedness.

I don't have the proof of God existence, it is up to you to prove that He doesn't.

Are you capable of proving that God does not exist?

If you aren't able to prove it, then it means that God does exist.

God exists.

And He isn't interested in us until we become interested in Him, in Him exclusively.

Do you understand what I am saying?

Ex-clu-sive-ly!

Twenty-four hours a day.

Your hearts and minds filled only with God.

There's no room for anything else.

No room for free will, no room for liberty, no room for emancipation.

Free yourself from God, I've heard people say.

Liberate yourself from God.

But the pain of liberation is unbearable, sharp enough to kill.

Without God... you are as good as dead.

Dead, abandoned strays wandering the streets.

We want to look you in the face.

You want to look me in my face?

Go see God first!

I won't help you. I'm not gonna show you the way.

Search for it.

Find Him.

And when you have found God, perhaps you will see me as well.

Stop it! How dare you shine a light on your Pope?

What you are doing is more than a simple lack of respect.

I don't know if you deserve me.

I don't know. At this point...

I don't know if you are worthy of me... I don't know...

Help me.

Help me, God.

Help me atone for all the wrong I'll have to do in order to save the Church.
